Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
Number of Reviews
28

Author
Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critic's Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
How many people remember when Bill Clinton, soon after being elected in
1992, appeared in the spring of 1993 mingling with a group of working
folks, complete with a hard-hat, tool belt and work boots.  Clinton took
it upon himself, after the meeting, to discipline an aide using
profanity after the aide supposedly stepped out of line during the
address.  This was evident as the President's microphone was still on
and the media had a field day.  In fairness to Clinton, every politician
has two faces, one for the cameras, and one for the private
confrontations with staff, family members and advisers.  What's the
point of all this?  Simple, 'Primary Colors' gives us an insight into
the REAL people running for office.
In 1995's 'The American President', Michael Douglas portrayed a stable
and popular President who was seen spending time with his daughter over
her school work, playing pool in private with his chief of staff and
courting a young woman with all the style, personality and conflict of
regular people.  Although 'Primary Colors' takes a deeper and more
iconoclastic look at politics on a much different scale, it has
chronological scenes of strategic planning necessary to win a political
campaign and it manages to entertain and inform while being precariously
off beat.
The major players are John Travolta, simulating brilliantly, a very
Clinton-like Presidential candidate, complete with the right hair,
weight and upbeat, pleasant southern accent.  Given the name Jack
Stanton by screenwriter Elaine May, 'Primary Colors' is based on the
novel by Anonymous, now revealed to be former Newsweek writer Joe Klein
and Stanton's mannerism is that of a man who cares about the people,
even in private as his campaign candidly admits that their political
tricks are a defensive mechanism to prevent the status quo from stealing
the election.  One scene has Stanton sitting alone in a doughnut shop
talking to a doughnut baker and night server, an employee who works long
hours for little money.  Stanton realizes that these are the real
people, the majority avoiding the trappings of special interest.  It's a
very memorable scene.
At his side is Stanton's wife and aspiring first lady, portrayed
impressively by Emma Thompson who loses her English accent completely to
play an American.  Stanton is joined in his quest for the White House by
Henry Burton (Adrian Lester), who is the grandson of a civil rights
leader and the story is told largely from his point of view.  Billy Bob
Thornton ('Sling Blade') is an adviser to Stanton who never lets his
true redneck colors interfere with the strategy of winning the people
over.  Rounding out the perennial cast of memorable players is Kathy
Bates as a political spin doctor, brought in to counter the dirty tricks
of Stanton's opponents.  Her contribution to the film is of the highest
calibre and she is already a candidate for a Supporting Actress Oscar
next year.
'Primary Colors' asks us to believe nothing,.  Using very adult language
and situations, it only intends to expose the inner workings of a
presidential campaign as its running time of 2 hours and 23 minutes is a
swift one as director Mike Nichols re-invents the characters situations
many times to seem like their fresh when they are really relevant to the
previous scenes of vigour, reality and determination to conquer the only
cherished object of politics.....power.  And while the film lacks a
certain amount of depth, it makes up for it by itemizing the true nature
of what politicians are, fallible human beings like the rest of us.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
One of my favorite television shows ever was a Discovery Channel
documentary on squirrels.  The show was investigating different
contraptions designed to keep squirrels away from bird feeders.  The
plucky squirrels were so successful (after a couple of dozen hilarious
attempts) at defeating the stratagems placed against them that the
producers finally created the world's first Squirrel Obstacle Course.
The heroic squirrel had to make impossible leaps, walk a tightrope,
climb a ladder, and even (I think) pedal a little squirrel bicycle, all
to get to the seeds in the bird feeder.  A true representation of the
triumph of the squirrel spirit.
Primary Colors isn't anywhere near as good as the squirrel show, but the
theme is the same, nonetheless.  John Travolta plays... um... an
empathetic baby-boomer Southern Governor with gray hair and a high, yet
hoarse voice.  The movie is about Governor "Jack Stanton", his 1992 race
for the Presidency, and the various obstacles along his path to the
White House.  Like our friend the squirrel, Stanton has to persevere
through all sorts of odd situations.  We see Stanton soliciting votes on
a New Hampshire streetcorner in the driving rain as if he were homeless
and looking for handouts.  We see him wearing a yarmulke and chatting up
Florida retirees about Medicare and Israel, and dealing with lesbian
hecklers in New York City.  We see him selling satellite technology to
the Chinese... wait, that's for the sequel.
We see a lot of the sheer physical effort it takes to survive a
Presidential campaign in Primary Colors, but the movie is mostly about
the moral effort expended.  Primary Colors raises deep moral questions
in the pragmatic context of politics:  When is it appropriate to run
negative ads?  How do you ask the candidate's wife if he's been sleeping
around behind her back?  If it's moral to research your opponent, is it
moral to use that research against him?  The mantra you hear in election
season is that campaigns should be about "the issues."  To its credit,
Primary Colors is about moral issues and the buffeting those issues
receive on the campaign trail.
It's also about politics.  Political junkies will find much to carp
about in the presentation of politics in the movie -- you never, ever,
not even once hear any reference to fundraising, which is unthinkable in
a novel about campaigning -- however, director Mike Nichols manages to
capture much of the energy, nerves, and confusion that surround a
political campaign.   The set design, from the motel rooms to the
storefront headquarters is authentic in its shabbiness.  The casting is
phenomenal.  The large roles are famously well-cast (especially Billy
Bob Thornton as James Carville), but the smaller roles are filled
imaginatively:  Rob Reiner as a schmaltzy Miami talk-show host, Larry
Hagman as a ghostly Presidential contender, former Dukes of Hazzard
actor-turned-Congressman Ben Jones as a media advisor.
The script follows the famous novel closely -- perhaps too closely --
and although the twists in the storyline are awkward, they parallel the
awkwardness of the 1992 campaign.  I was, for a while, incredibly
distracted by the comings and goings of the assorted staff members, the
subplots that sputtered and went nowhere, until I realized that
campaigning is distracting in just that way, and that real-life subplots
don't always play out.
However, Primary Colors qualifies as a disappointment because what we
see on the movie screen is so at odds with what we know of real life.
Part of this is due to the unhealthy, interest we show in our leading
politicians.  Travolta plays a character based on a man whose private
life over the last six years has been scrutinized to an extent surpassed
only by the fictional protagonist of The Truman Show.  As a result, we
all think we know the President, and although Travolta does a fine job
of impersonation, he doesn't measure up.  Primary Colors gives us
nothing more than a superficial caricature of the real candidate.  His
worst enemies will concede that Bill Clinton is a thoughtful and
intelligent man, well-versed in public policy.  Travolta's character has
no grasp of public policy other than a desire to do big things, very
little personal warmth or charisma, and seemingly compulsive eating
habits.  The vague, buffoonish and broad characterization of the Clinton
character strikes me as more than a little unfair -- and this is coming
from a reviewer who is a confirmed right-winger, mind you.
In the same vein, Billy Bob Thornton may be perfectly cast as James
Carville, but he is wretchedly underused and cheaply stereotyped as an
ignorant redneck, no smarter than the role he played in The Apostle.
Adrian Lester has a smarter role as the narrator/campaign manager, but
he's saddled with a naive idealism worthy of the misfit volunteers who
people the storefront offices and make copies.  Only Maura Tierney, in a
too-brief role as media spokesman, has the appropriate level of
intelligence and cynicism you'd expect from a veteran political
operative.
Paradoxically, both the least and most most crudely drawn performances
in Primary Colors are the best.  Emma Thompson sheds her English accent
to play Travolta's long-suffering wife.  She manages to wrench a
profound and moving performance from the lines she's given, playing a
character with the intelligence, sensitivity and guts to deal with the
stress of the campaign and her husband's cheating heart.  Kathy Bates,
as a political troubleshooter -- or "Dustbuster", as she terms herself
--  is the most broadly overdrawn character in a movie full of overdrawn
characters.  She acts like a cartoon character throughout the movie,
screaming and brandishing guns, she redeems that performance with a
touching and pivotal role in the movie's climax.
But placing these performances aside, the heart of Primary Colors is
Travolta's Clinton.  With the tragic death of Phil Hartman, Travolta may
be the best Clinton impersonator out there today.  It's unfortunate that
Travolta's performance in this movie is more "Saturday Night Live" than
"Saturday Night Fever".  Primary Colors is a dishonest look at a
frequently dishonest political culture, and a misuse of quality actors
and moviemakers.  Nevertheless, there are enough positive things about
the movie to make a trip to the video store worthwhile -- unless, of
course, the Discovery Channel runs that squirrel documentary again.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Are you kidding?  No jury in the world would
convict a baby for murder.  Well, maybe Texas."

Author
Luke Buckmaster
There's a thin line between satire and controversy, and Mike Nichols (The 
Birdcage, Wolf) has directed a sharp and very honest look at a US presidential 
election.  Based on the book written by "Anonymous" (actually former "Newsweek" 
writer Joe Klein), John Travolta plays Governor Jack Stanton. But he doesn't 
actually play Stanton.  He plays Bill Clinton; just the same as Emma Thompson 
no doubt plays the First Lady and Billy Bob Thorton is the campaign manipulator 
James Carville (although the credits will of course say otherwise).
The film is taken from the perspective of Henry Burton (Adrian Lester), a 
morally correct and somewhat hesitant new advisor to Stanton.  He searches for 
justice and dignity in the ugliest possible situations, and whether it be 
keeping the history of his boss' pants under wraps or contemplating digging up 
dirt on another politician, he approaches his work with a keen desire to 
skillfully serve his country and his fellow workers.
Richard Jemmons (Billy Bob Thorton) and Daisy Green (Maura Tierney) team up 
with Henry as the would-be president's advisors, and hire lesbian veteran Libby 
Holden (Kathy Bates) as the campaign's eccentric "tougher than dirt" 
incriminator.  Together they face all sorts of sexual allegations, the 
irritatingly discourteous media and other witty politicians in the election 
race.
In its satire and controversy, Primary Colors is a similar film to Wag the Dog: 
they both are not afraid to wipe their noses in the nitty-gritty and take a 
bold look at something that will never has honesty as a virtue.  But whereas 
Wag showed us how much affect a few people can have on the media, Primary 
Colors is much more concerned with fleshing out it's characters, letting us 
understand what they want and why, and making us truly appreciate the humanity 
and rectitude that they graciously represent. 
Seeing John Travolta play Bill Clinton so confidently and justly is enough to 
make the film more than worth a look.  And the rest of the cast also make 
superb performances - Adrian Lester sharply portrays the intellect of Henry 
whilst Kathy Bates is perfect as the robust and energetic Libby Holden.   
At occasions, you can't help but feel that these terrific characters are going 
to waste.  There are long slabs of time where John Travolta (unquestionably the 
most interesting to watch) is missed from the screen; and since it is awkwardly 
structured as Henry's story we are often forced to watch scenes that perhaps 
are not so necessary to the central plot - or even the point of the film.  
Having said that, make no mistake - Primary Colors is always enjoyable to 
watch.  But frequently we have to ask ourselves - exactly what are we watching?
Most of the first half of its duration is a lightheaded look at melodramatic 
confrontations that seem so genuine we cannot help but laugh, but the way 
Primary Colors chooses to finish tackles aspects that are very contrary, and 
almost unsuitable, to the rest of the film.  But as I mentioned before, there 
is a thin line between satire and controversy - and for the most part, Primary 
Colors delivers an entertaining indulgence of political matters combined with a 
far-from-overpowering look at winning the public's opinion.
Although at occasions the film may jump around a little too freely, focus is 
never lost on how important and vulnerable the subject matter really is.  
Thankfully, it is clear to make the distinction on what is entertaining movie 
cosmetics and what is a provocative documentation of something so really it's 
scary.


Author
Jon Popick
I love it when a film like Primary Colors (code name: The Big Lewinsky)
opens amid waves of controversy because of its star or its content.
Remember when Hugh Grant got busted with the hooker right before Nine
Months came out?  The unintentionally perfect timing of the release
makes people scrutinize the story and, more specifically, the dialogue
even more than they ordinarily would.  I mean, there were a LOT of
inadvertent blowjob references in Nine Months if you REALLY listened.
Even the tag-line prophesizes the lead-in on the evening news ("What
Went Down on the Way to the Top").
Colors starts right away with the unplanned comparisons to today's
headlines as it shows a campaigning Jack Stanton (John Travolta) and his
amazing handshaking technique.  The right hand is just for shaking,
while the left hand is used as a barometer to judge the recipients
importance, based on how high it ends up on their arm.  You can't help
thinking about his right hand squeezing some bim's hooter while his left
hand is gingerly pulling hers toward his crotch.  Yikes!
The fine art of the handshake is being explained to Henry Burton
(Richard Lester), the idealistic grandson of a great black civil rights
leader.  Henry is being wooed to join Stanton in his bid for the
Democratic presidential nomination.  He is skeptical at first, but
quickly chooses the puffy white Stanton (the Governor of an ominously
unnamed southern state) over his current mentor, a black Congressman who
has left Henry quite disenchanted with politics in general.
Henry realizes that he has finally found the rare politician who
actually cares about the people he represents.  He weeps as he first
sees Stanton in action at an adult literacy center in New York as his
new boss tells a marvelous story about his war-hero uncle who couldn't
get a job because he couldn't read.  Henry stays on board despite
finding out that Stanton not only made up the story, but also scheduled
the appearance just to bed the teacher.
The bumbling teacher is just the tip of the adultery iceberg and not the
only stumbling block en route to the oval office.  There is the
marijuana thing.  There is the draft-dodging thing.  There is the matter
of having an arrest expunged from his permanent record.  And, of course,
there is the mass consumption of barbecue and donuts.
The film is held together by director Mike Nichols (The Birdcage) and
scribe Elaine May (Ishtar), as well as lenser Michael Ballhaus
(GoodFellas).  They capture the conniving underbelly of modern politics
with a keen eye and make us interested in a story that we have all heard
again and again.
Travolta is amazingly Clintonesque as Stanton, a role that I never
believed he could pull off.  He has the raspy voice, the waddle and the
look of genuine concern down cold.  Thompson is not very Hillaryesque,
but this would be the side of her that the public never sees.  The
juiciest roles are saved for Billy Bob and Kathy Bates, the former a
pervert and the latter a lesbian.  They play expert political
strategists with a large dollop of unconditional lunacy, stealing every
scene they're in.  Newcomer Adrian Lester is quite capable as the green
central character and exudes the innocent charm of a Joe Buck or even a
Dirk Diggler.  Larry Hagman has never been better as Stanton's rival,
Freddy Picker.  But I never watched Dallas, so take that statement with
a grain of salt.
Colors has the same kind of fly-on-the-wall, behind-the-scenes feel of
the last two Betty Thomas films, The Late Shift and Private Parts.  It
is powerfully entertaining and thought provoking for the first two
hours, but the last 30 minutes become a bit heavy-handed with its
tiresome ethical message of `doing the right thing'.  The performances
and gratuitous vomiting scene alone make it well worth the trip to your
local cinema.

Author
Ryan Davis
Well director Mike Nichols(The Birdcage, Regarding Henry) is nothing but a
talented director, who never fails to be entertaining, and even inspiring
at times. His latest film, a political satire, about the 1992 Democratic
presidential primary is all that and more.
Jack Stanton(John Travolta) is running for president, a big step up from
governor of a southern state. His campaign is being headed by Henry
Burton(Adrian Lester), a ambitious young black man who's grandfather was a
highly esteemed civil rights leader. Other members of the group include his
political strategist(Billy Bob Thornton), his wife(Emma Thompson), Libby
Holden(Kathy Bates), and Daisy(Maura Tierney), together, they form the
weirdest group ever to help win a presidential election. The road to the
White House isn't easy though, along the way they battle a sex scandal and
several skeletons in Jack Stanton's closet.  
This is a fun movie, lighthearted and generally amusing. Its filled with
splendid performances from John Travolta(Oscar Nomination in his future),
Billy Bob Thornton(always brilliant), Emma Thompson(great as the power
hungry wife), and Kathy Bates(One of the best things about Titanic).
Unfortunately the movie suffers from a few flaws. The point of view is my
main example, Henry's character was bland and his acting certainly lacked
passion and was rather somber at times.  The second flaw was the editing,
it left little bits and pieces of things(for instance Henry's relationship
with his girlfriend) that should have been edited out completely. Apart
from these complaints the movie it worth seeing simply for John Travolta's
incredibly brilliant performance as our beloved(or scorned) President Bill
Clinton, it is certainly a memorable role. Not to mention the mostly great
supporting cast, its highly entertaining and bitterly funny.

Author
Mark O'Hara
I have not read the novel by "Anonymous" Joe Klein, and I wouldn't have 
picked the film "Primary Colors" as my first choice of the weekend, but 
I was pleasantly engaged.
First, John Travolta is right-on as Jack Stanton -- the Clintonesque 
quiet yet raspy drawl, the gut, the "tell me your pain" empathy. Emma 
Thompson is almost as strong as first lady-to-be Susan Stanton. In one 
scene in which this stolidly patient wife discovers another dalliance, 
Thompson snaps magnificently: it's as if her soul is slipping out of 
her. Her anger and then her grief are stunning to watch.
She'll probably be forgotten by the end of the year, but Kathy Bates 
should get nominated for supporting actress. As Libby the "Dust Buster," 
her character protects (as much as possible) the name of Jack Stanton, a 
friend from the 70's. Bates brings a literally crazy abandon to Libby, 
who is one of the few characters who is even concerned about taking and 
passing a morality test.
I've read in other reviews about a flaw in narration. Henry is the 
campaign worker through whose eyes we see most of the action. The 
trouble is that Adrian Lester turns in a performance that is solid but 
not dynamic. Sure, no one wants to try to out-act Bates and Travolta and 
Thornton, but Henry never shows us the passion that he claims to hold in 
his heart; he keeps it in his head. What causes him to stop working for 
one politician, to forfeit his relationship with a beautiful woman, to 
change his mind so easily when Jack Stanton asks him to?
"Primary Colors" sports a superb cast, down to the extras. Mike Nichols' 
last few efforts have been strong and solid, and this adds to the 
string. 


Author
Scott Renshaw
PRIMARY COLORS
(Universal)
Starring:  John Travolta, Emma Thompson, Adrian Lester, Billy Bob
Thornton, Kathy Bates, Maura Tierney, Paul Guilfoyle, Larry Hagman.
Screenplay:  Elaine May, based on the novel by Anonymous.
Producer:  Mike Nichols.
Director:  Mike Nichols.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  143 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Just so there's no confusion:  Jack Stanton (John Travolta), the
"fictional" scandal-plagued Democratic presidential candidate whose
campaign is the subject of PRIMARY COLORS, is Bill Clinton.  His ambitious
wife Susan (Emma Thompson) is our First Lady.  Stanton's home-state buddy
and campaign strategist Richard Jemmons (Billy Bob Thornton) is James
Carville.  The waffling, never-seen Italian-American governor of New York,
called Orlando Ozzio here, is Mario Cuomo.  And for that matter, the
"Anonymous" author of the best-selling novel on which PRIMARY COLORS is
based is actually former "Newsweek" writer Joe Klein.
     It's ironic that Klein could tell a story about the effect of
scandal-mongering on American politics only by creating a bit of scandal
himself, that he could uncover a few brutal truths only by hiding a few.
It's even more ironic that the film version of PRIMARY COLORS appears just
as President Clinton finds himself entangled in new scandals, virtually
guaranteeing that most coverage of the film will both miss the point
entirely and help make the film's point for it.  PRIMARY COLORS isn't
simply a chance to giggle at Clinton's foibles without naming him.  This
is a story about giggling at foibles masquerading as serious news, about a
political process which has become a seemingly endless cycle of
mud-slinging and spin control because we continue to create an audience
for it.
     In that sense, it's a very similar story to the recent WAG THE DOG,
though simultaneously more human and more cynical.  PRIMARY COLORS unfolds
through the eyes of Henry Burton (Adrian Lester), an up-and-coming
campaign pro desperately seeking a candidate worthy of his admiration.
Burton begins to develop what Jemmons calls "True Believer-ism" as
Stanton's campaign progresses, convinced that this is a candidate with
vision and a genuine desire to help others.  As revelation builds upon
revelation, however, the questions he has to ask himself grow ever more
troubling.  Does it matter that this man who wants to do so much for the
country seems to be doing it one woman at a time?  Do the ends of getting
into office where you can do some good justify the means of slinging even
more mud at the opponent than he slings at you?  And how can you make
ideas worth anything in a culture where viewers watch an interview with
the Stantons and can only comment that Susan "should wear her hair
longer."
     PRIMARY COLORS the movie manages to wrap all of the novel's tough
questions and roman-a-clef characters into a surprisingly funny and
entertaining package.  Though the running time of nearly 2-1/2 hours feels
excessive near the end, director Mike Nichols crafts so many sharp comic
scenes that the film never becomes a tedious political science lecture.
He also gets one particularly dynamic performance from a generally solid
cast -- Kathy Bates as Libby, the Stanton's borderline-loony long-time
friend and the campaign's designated "Dust-Buster" (because she's "tougher
than dirt").  Though the role initially seems like just a minor variation
on Bates' brassy, no-nonsense characters in DOLORES CLAIBORNE, THE LATE
SHIFT or TITANIC, Libby eventually develops into the real soul of PRIMARY
COLORS:  the last true idealist, a woman whose very sanity depends on the
notion that there has to be a better way to select those who will lead us.
     Of course, another performance will draw far more attention, which is
precisely why PRIMARY COLORS couldn't possibly work as well on film as it
does on the page.  Without a face, Jack Stanton is a complex and
sympathetic character study representing a wide-spread problem.  The
moment John Travolta appears on screen with his salt-and-pepper pompadour,
the titters begin; the moment he opens his mouth and begins his sandpaper
drawl of a Clinton impression, the full-fledged laughs begin.  As
effective as Elaine May's script may be -- and Travolta's performance, for
that matter -- plenty of viewers will simply gape at PRIMARY COLORS in
tabloid fascination, thinking of it as THE BILL CLINTON STORY.  There's a
sad lesson behind the laughs in PRIMARY COLORS, one you'll be able to spot
in reviews and reactions colored by the lenses of Intern-Gate, Grope-Gate,
or any other Gate:  we're getting exactly the leaders we deserve when we
refuse to make their messages matter, and all we can do is throw up an
endless series of Gates in front of them.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Most viewers probably suspected that PRIMARY COLORS from THE
BIRDCAGE's collaborative team of director Mike Nichols and writer
Elaine May would be a funny comedy, although many may have feared,
incorrectly, that it would wallow in caricature and cheap shots.  What
is so surprising about what has turned out to be the best new movie
released thus far this year is that it is so much more that merely
funny.  Nichols and May have produced a veritable laugh riot that
manages to move seamlessly from comedy to tragedy to social commentary
and back again.  An adroit movie that can turn on a dime, it mesmerizes
its audiences in the same way that its fictional governor wins the
hearts and minds of his audiences.
     After the 1992 campaign columnist, Joe Klein, writing under the
pseudonym "Anonymous," turned his observations and research into a
novel by changing the characters' names and transforming some of the
incidents.  Given the subsequent scandals, especially the current ones,
the movie borders on being almost frighteningly relevant.
     Starting with close-ups of Clinton -- oops, I did it already -- I
mean Southern governor Jack Stanton shaking hands, we learn the subtle
meanings of his various handshakes.  (And, if the explanations are
correct, then when the real life Clinton shook my hand during the
campaign, I got a grade C handshake that meant nothing.)
     As Governor Stanton, a beefed up John Travolta gives a creepily
accurate portrayal.  When he feels people's pains on the campaign
trail, he usually spins some story from his childhood that the crowd
can identify with.  That the stories contain at best only a grain of
truth doesn't lessen his belief in them or their effect on the citizens
listening.  He's one of them, and they like him.
     From the beginning we learn that Jack likes all of his
constituents, especially the pretty, young females.  And his aides
happily look the other way when he beds one early on in the picture.
     As his wife, Susan, Emma Thompson gives an equally superlative
performance.  The Stantons' apparently dysfunctional marriage is
actually highly functional since both share a single-minded desire to
get to the top.  If that means Susan has to yell, curse like a sailor
and throw things at Jack in front of the help, well, so be it.  Jack,
for his part, never seems to mind.  It's the price he's used to paying
for a life of licentiousness.  "The only shot we have here is to be
perfect," Susan lectures him when he is late as usual.  The irony is
that they have no hope of attaining perfection, but they are both such
superlative political operatives that neither needs it.
     Amidst all the hullabaloo of the campaign are quieter moments of
delicate power.  In the George Stephanopoulos part, Adrian Lester plays
Henry Burton, the son of a famous civil rights leader, who wants to
change the world.  He sees Jack as his ticket to where real power lies,
but he's worried that he's selling his soul when he's asked to join the
Stanton entourage as a key aide.  At one point the sleaze overwhelms
Henry, and he's forced to stop the car so he can throw up.
     When Henry goes to set up his first campaign headquarters, the
clueless crowd just stares at him when he asks if anyone has any
skills.  Finally, one guy breaks the silence to allow as how he speaks
Hebrew.
     In easily the best performance in the picture, SLING BLADE's Billy
Bob Thornton plays the role of firebrand, redneck Richard Jemmons,
modeled after James Carville.  Billy Bob manages to make the frequently
obnoxious Carville into a likable, albeit outrageous, political
operative par excellence.  Richard, like his boss, does have his
foibles, seen, for example, when he exposes himself to fellow campaign
worker, Jennifer Rogers, played by Stacy Edwards from IN THE COMPANY OF
MEN.  One hopes members of the Academy will remember Billy Bob's
performance when it comes time next year to vote for supporting actors.
     The picture is so funny at times that you may have trouble
controlling yourself, Jack and Richard's "mamathon" being one of the
rib-ticklingest.  Susan explains that when a couple of southern boys
get together and start swapping stories about their mamas, they may go
on forever.  And in another scene, in which a cocky son of one of
Jack's opponents apologizes to Susan with a "Hope you don't mind if we
talk business?" she cattily assures him it's okay to discuss politics
with her husband in front of her.  "How else can I learn?" replies the
ultra-savvy woman with beautifully fake naivete.
     Nichols has a gift for staging physical comedy.  When Jack loses
his temper, he throws the cell phone out the window.  This causes Jack
and Susan to go searching through the bushes when they realize they
need it after all.  Almost like sparring boxers, Nichols and May seem
to try to outdo each other in their collaboration.  May, for example,
comes up with a wonderfully complicated conundrum for Richard.  He
introduces a folksy tale about defecating in the woods while wild bears
attack that has everyone around the table interpreting his metaphors
differently.  Almost all of Richard's hilarious lines in the movie are
unprintable although one particular astute one isn't.  "That's what
these guys do," he says of the transient loyalty of politicians like
his boss.  "They love you and then stop lovin' you."
     In another wonderful piece of work, Kathy Bates is a tough lesbian
named Libby Holden, who puts out scandals in general and bimbo
eruptions in particular.  "From now on you can call me the 'Dust
Buster,'" Libby explains her role.  "I'm stronger than dirt."
     Larry Hagman, as Gov. Fred Picker, one of Jack's opponents, gives
the best performance of his career.  If you've ever had doubts about
the depth of his acting abilities, wait until his last scene, which is
stunning.
     "I'm going to tell you something really outrageous," Jack tells a
group of blue-collar workers.  "I'm going to tell you the truth."  In a
career in which his veracity always remains subservient to winning,
this could indeed be considered outrageous.
     Since the movie is just a time slice from a long campaign,
choosing how to end it is tricky.  The choice they made involves
setting before the Stantons a moral test that serves as kind of a
metaphor for the Stantons' political careers.  Like the ending of the
TITANIC, the outcome of their moral test is never really in question.
     PRIMARY COLORS runs 2:20 but feels much shorter.  It is rated R
for profanity and sexual references and would be fine for teenagers.

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Mike Nichols
Writer: Elaine May (based on the novel by Joe Klein, who would like to
remain anonymous)
Starring: John Travolta, Emma Thompson, Adrian Lester, Kathy Bates, Billy
Bob Thornton, Maura Tierney, Paul Guilfoyle, Larry Hagman, Caroline Aaron,
Diane Ladd, Stacy Edwards, Tommy Hollis, Allison Janney, Robert Klein,
Mykelti Williamson, Rob Reiner, Tony Shalhoub, Chelcie Ross, Larry King,
Bill Maher
To be blunt, "Primary Colors" is one of the angriest and cynical films
about running for political office ever made, but luckily it doesn't allow
these two overpowering feelings to crush the film's power as entertainment.
 What could have been a really cynical reflection on working for the
Clinton campaign back in '92 (which is what the book by Joe "Anonymous"
Klein is) is instead an epic intelligent satire on a campaign very similar
to that one, not showing what an asswhole Bill Clinton may be, but what the
campaign road does to the people working on it.  Which, of course, suits me
just fine since I would have voted for him if I had been of age back then.
The focus of "Primary Colors" is, in fact, not even on Bill and Hillary
Clinton (as well as Chelsea), but on a man named Henry Burton (Adrian
Lester, nicely faking an American accent) who's the son of a famous civil
rights leader, and who becomes the film's version of George Stephanopolous.
 He's interested in working for an Arkansas governor named Jack Stanton
(John Travolta, done up in Clinton-gear), but before officially signing on
to the team, finds himself on his private jet to New Hampshire with Stanton
sleeping on his shoulder.
Before he can even get new clothes from his house, Burton has been swept
away by Stanton and his ideals (he sees him cry over a speech an uneducated
man played by Mykelti Williamson who describes his inability to read), and
has been given a head post of a campaign office.  Burton respects Stanton,
and has convinced himself that he is a good person and candidate, even
after seeing how he acts when not with people who can further his political
career.  As the film goes on, Burton finds himself on the road with Stanton
and a couple of other team members, such as: a James Carville-esque
political strategist, Richard Jemmons (a great Billy Bob Thornton); a
fellow worker named Daisy Green ("NewsRadio"'s Maura Tierney), who begins a
relationship with Burton more out of a lack of nothing else to do than out
of love; and others, like a member played by Paul Guilfoyle, who's been in
everything recently...or at least it seems that way.
The truth is, though, that Stanton's weakness is his libido, and the film
not only has a Gennifer Flowers for us, but also a young daughter of a
friends' who he may or may not have gotten pregnant.  Stanton seems to not
be able to control this, even after speaking to him about it, and this
obviously becomes his big weak point in terms of the media's coverage of
his race to become president.
The film is obviously and unsubtlely a caricature of the Clintons, even
giving Travolta the exact look of Clinton (right down to his eyebrows), and
portraying Stanton's Hillary, Susan (Emma Thompson, also faking a nice
American accent...or at least giving a good try), as a tough woman, almost
totally resembling Hillary's rough outer edge.  This may seem cheap, but
the film actually doesn't try and show how they are alone, and we never see
how Jack's infidelities hurt Susan.  There are at least three occurances of
Jack and Susan being left alone by someone else so that they can argue, but
we leave along with the people, never seeing what occurs in private.  This
is a wise choice: how does the film know what goes on?  Trying to come up
with a solution to the question of what goes on behind their closed doors
would lead to a mistep in the film.  The fact that Jack Stanton isn't in
all of this film is one of the film's major benefits.
There's another chief character in the film in the form of Kathy Bates (ha
ha) named Libby Holden, a woman who is hired by Stanton's staff to uncover
any secret information about Jack that could harm him (a woman uncovers a
time when Jack was arrested and released by a Senator).  Kathy plays her as
an extremely tough woman, bullying anyone who gets in her way, and taking
on a very demanding presence in Jack's staff.
One of the great things about this film is how it treats her character:
she's seen as a stereotype when she walks into the film for the first time
(the tough lesbian, sleeping with little staff member Stacy Edwards, who
just starred in "In the Company of Men" and is currently residing on
"Chicago Hope"), but as the film goes on, she is forced to do some
reconnaissance work AGAINST the main opponent (who soon becomes none other
than Larry Hagman, sans Jeanie), and reveals herself to not just be a tough
woman, but a woman with a strict moral center, who is only up for
protecting people from themselves, not hurting innocent people.
The film presents all of this with a touch of cynicism (after all, it's
told from the point of view of someone who has to endure all of this), but
with the right amount of reflexion, seeing that the problem with the
campaign road was not with Jack Stanton and his infidelities, but really
with being on the road itself.  Campaigning is shown to tear people apart,
make them crazy and do horrible things as things get worse.  Where else
would all of a person's past occurances come to light and be scrutinized
like it was something they did yesterday?
The greatest thing about this film is its presentation of Jack Stanton,
who's seen as a man with a severe character flaw, but is still a very good
person, and one hell of a politician.  Seeing him sitting down and
listening to people is something that is a very sellable political trait,
and the fact that his main wont in life is to help people makes him a good
person, not just a very good politician.  And the fact that we don't know
everything about him is one of the film's best traits.
"Primary Colors" comes off as being more honest than cynical, probably
because it tells it more as a reflexion of being on the road, remembering
what it was like those lonesome nights in the hotel room, and watching the
TV nervously, wondering what place the candidate your working for will get
a high rating.  It's bitter about how the media took advantage of the
candidate's past, trying to make them out to be horrible creatures, and
then how the other candidates tried to use this information for their own
benefit.  And it's even a little annoyed by the talk show hosts who mock
political leaders (represented by Bill Maher - what?  Leno was busy?),
taking advantage of the weakness of being completely in the public's eye. 
It's angry and pissed off about this, but it's not overbearing.
"Primary Colors" is only the second film to be pissed off at the media in
terms of the way they handle politics in under six months (the others being
"Wag the Dog" and "Bulworth"), but this film actually comes off as being
more human and epic than those.  One of the best things about "Primary
Colors" is how it's mad as hell, but it has the intelligence to not let
that bring it down.  It's concerned with the way it affects people, making
them do terrible things to other people, and how it drives the people who
work for it sometimes over the edge.  I guess it's not so much an
adaptation of the bitter novel as much as it is a reflexion on it much
later with more facts and deeper recollection.
Just this week there was a primary in my home town where the one candidate
sent out newsletters to potential voters, telling them a bunch of lies
about the opponent, resulting in his win by over 50 percent.  Do I think
the guy who did this is an asswhole?  Well, I don't know him very well
(although I did shake his hand once), but I'm just assuming he did this out
of the stress of working so hard to run for political office and worrying
that it may result in nothing.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: John Travolta, Emma Thompson, Adrian Lester, Billy Bob Thornton,
Maura Tierney, Kathy Bates, Larry Hagman, Paul Guilfoyle
Director: Mike Nichols
Producers: Mike Nichols
Screenplay: Elaine May based on the novel by "Anonymous" (Joe Klein)
One has to compliment John Travolta for perfecting his accent too match
that of President Clinton and from a distance even looking like him.
Emma Thompson has the hair thing down to a Hilary Clinton, and although
she finds it hard to kick the English accent completely, does a good job
impersonating the 1st Lady.
There is nothing like running a Presidential campaign. The lying,
cheating, sleeping about, cover ups, tearing down, scandalising, rumour
spreading, deceptions, name calling, fraudulent defaming etc etc.
Everything you've heard and hate about politics  well it's true.
So does this movie harm the Clintons' public popularity? I don't think
so, because when all is said and done, this movie tells us not to judge
a person for what they have done in the past (no doubt referring to the
sex scandals), but what they can do for the nation in the future. So
three cheers for Bill and the US of A. Another point made by this movie
is how difficult it is to practice clean politics in an arena full of
hungry lions. Also how the pure ideals of hopeful young presidential
candidates become corrupted by the crooked way the game is played.
This movie gives us a close look at what it's like to run a campaign.
The strategy planning, staying a step ahead of the opposition, how to
get public votes, using the media and damage control. Although this is
not engrossing material for a Friday night at the movies, it is still a
fascinating subject. For those of you thinking about getting into
politics, take a long hard look at this movie before jumping into the
Hornets nest. Kathy Bates (MISERY) gives us another powerful performance
as a political strategist that may get a nod from the Academy next year.
Timothy Voon
e-mail: stirling@netlink.com.au
Movie Archives http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Tim+Voon
Hugues Bouclier's Movies in Melbourne
http://www.labyrinth.net.au/~bouclier/week/movies.html

Author
Jerry Saravia
A Look Back at PRIMARY COLORS (1998) and THE WAR ROOM (1993)
After hearing the media's relentless obsession over President Clinton's sexual
life and personal affairs (not to mention "Wag the Dog"), we get Mike Nichols'
irreverent, deeply hysterical "Primary Colors" that centers on a presidential
candidate trying to evade questions about purported sexual dalliances. This
couldn't be a more timely subject and make no mistake, this film is about
President Clinton. "Primary Colors" also reminded me of the intoxicating
documentary "The War Room" from 1993, which focused on Governor Clinton's run
for the presidency in 1992. The same basic premise exists for both films: the
underdog aiming for the presidency amid a flurry of rumors and personal
bashing. 
"Primary Colors" stars John Travolta as the white-haired, doughnut-eating,
Arkansas-bred Jack Stanton who vies for the presidential office. As played by
Travolta, Jack is quite a charmer and full of charisma, more so than Clinton.
He is even married to a Hillary Clinton-type, played to the hilt by Emma
Thompson using an authentic American accent. Stanton gets help from his
campaign staff headed by a James Carville-redneck-type (Billy Bob Thornton),
and a promising, idealistic campaign staffer Henry Burton (Adrian Lester). Jack
has fleeting sexual flings with co-workers while the staff prepares a campaign
aimed at proving to the people that Stanton believes in putting the people's
needs first. 
Unfortunately, Stanton's sexual history is put at the forefront of the
political forum and is exploited by fellow candidates, including Gov. Fred
Picker (Larry Hagman in top form) who enters the race late - Picker may
intentionally remind you of Ross Perot. In order to defend himself against
verbal attacks and seemingly fabricated tape recordings, Jack enlists the help
of an old friend, Libby Holden (an intense Kathy Bates) a.k.a. "Dustbuster," a
lesbian, all-purpose troubleshooter who has no qualms about placing a gun on a
man's privates. 
"Primary Colors" is based on the book of the same name by Anonymous (recently
known as political journalist Joe Klein), and it is rife with richly drawn
characters, an acidly sharp script by Elaine May, and astute direction by Mike
Nichols. It is a film that begins as comedy and slowly evolves into a dark
satire - a reproach of the process by which someone like Jack Stanton gets
elected despite the personal allegations. 
"The War Room" is a vibrant, witty excursion into the presidential campaign of
1992 when then Gov. Clinton was running for office. The film follows the
campaign process via chief political strategist James Carville and adviser
George Stephanopolous, and is all set in the "war room," formerly a Little Rock
newspaper office. 
Carville and Stephanopolous are two of the most charismatic characters I've
seen in a documentary (or film) in a long time, and they couldn't be more
opposite in their physical demeanor. Carville, in his Southern drawl, is always
actively making decisions whether it's about prepared speeches, the look of a
campaign poster, or arguing endlessly on the phone about the other candidates
or Clinton's past - "Every time somebody even farts the word 'draft,' it makes
the paper."         Stephanopolous is the more timid, quiet, reserved individual -
he reminds me a lot of Michael J. Fox's character Alex P. Keaton in "Family
Ties"; Fox subsequently played a variation of George in "The American
President." George is more subtle and calm than Carville, and operates in an
equally articulate manner. At one crucial point, George receives a call from a
black woman claiming to have given birth to Clinton's child. George convinces
the caller that she will be ridiculed in the press if she comes out with such a
sensational story. This scene is reminiscent of the scene in "Primary Colors"
where Stanton's advisers visit a teenage black girl claiming to have the
candidate's baby. 
As directed by D.A. Pennebaker and Chris Hegedus, "The War Room" is very keen
on details and conversations between staff and personnel regarding the plight
of the Clinton campaign. The atmosphere grows more and more tense as we get to
the inevitable climax where Clinton wins the nomination in the election
victory. On the eve of the election, Carville gives an emotional speech
regarding the strong effort he and his aides have made in helping Clinton, and
the positive effect politics has had on his life. George is even questioned by
the secretary as to how he feels: "Exhausted." 
"The War Room" could have used more footage of Clinton and perhaps the
filmmakers could have catched him in truly private, unguarded moments as to how
he really felt about the adultery charges. Still, "The War Room" and "Primary
Colors" greatly succeed in capturing the political atmosphere and the
exhausting process in which a candidate is elected. The irony is that Clinton
and Stanton's adulterous affairs not only sidestepped their political agendas,
but made them stronger candidates for the presidency. In other words, give the
people what they want. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   "Hitler never looked at another woman after Eva Braun.
Does that make him any better than Jefferson, Roosevelt and
Kennedy?"  While this quote by a member of the presidential
campaign team seems to signal that "Primary Colors" is pro-
Clinton, the big question which viewers will toy with in their
post-screening discussion with one another is whether this
high-profile picture is balanced, favoring the president, or
designed to smirch his reputation.  Without question,
Governor Jack Stanton (John Travolta) is a stand-in for Mr.
Clinton: every scene in this exploration of his primary election
campaign evokes the pungency of Clinton's struggle for the
top office and the difficulties he faced when confronted with
charges of womanizing.  Given the fact that Mike Nichols,
who directed the work and who teams up with long-time
collaborator Elaine May (who wrote the script based on
journalist Joe Klein's novel of the same name), has always
been considered a Clinton supporter, we wonder how he is
able to smudge the former southern governor's reputation as
much as he does.  
   "Primary Colors" will disappoint those whose exposure to
political film runs exclusively to stories like "The Day of the
Jackal," "The Candidate," "Dave," and any previous offering
that offers either comic sketches or paranoid portraits of the
man in the Oval Office.  Its 140 minutes are devoted to a
careful inquiry into the nature of politics and shows more than
any other film to date all that must go into a primary battle--
the heartaches, the exposure of one's private life, the
disappointments, the betrayals.  This makes for involving
storytelling for a targeted audience of educated people willing
to listen careful to some precious dialogue and draw
conclusions on subtle points of interpretation.  It shows the
current president, who is here given the name of Jack
Stanton, has good features and flaws like anyone lower than
the saints, and one emerges with a new respect for a guy
who was chief executive of a relatively backwater state,
largely unknown to all but political mavens.  
   Looking and sounding so much like Bill Clinton that one can
almost swear that he is seeing the chief executive himself,
John Travolta turns in a dramatic albeit understated portrait of
a winner who really does listen to the voice of the working
class, who is a touch-feely person who thoroughly enjoys
physical contact of all kinds, and who despite some
exaggerated gestures of sympathy with those who are down
on their luck has a genuine compassion for ordinary people. 
The story begins with efforts by the Stanton campaign people
to draft Henry Burton (Adrian Lester) into the crusade,
knowing that this eloquent, charismatic African-American--who
is also the grandson of a great civil rights leader--could do
marvelous things for the candidate's image.  Unsure whether
he wants to accept the prestigious position, Burton decides to
observe the man at work and is taken in by Stanton's
empathy with the hapless students at an adult literacy center,
where he tells the gathering a largely phony story of how his
Uncle Charlie won the Medal of Honor but declined an
impressive job offer because he was ashamed to admit his
illiteracy.  We are quickly introduced to other members of the
staff, including Richard Jemmons (Billy Bob Thornton), who is
the James Carville stand-in, the articulate Daisy, who
schedules the appointments, and the "dust-buster" Libby
(Kathy Bates), a dynamo lesbian given the mandate of finding
dirt on Stanton's opponent.
   So much of the film comes out of recent newspaper
headlines that the movie becomes too predictable in spots, as
when a blond bimbette shows up on national TV to play a
tape implicating the candidate in an affair.  In a bizarre
development, a simple black man who had been a friend of
Stanton accuses his pal of getting the man's daughter
pregnant.  
   A central moral issue raised by the movie is whether it is
ethical or even wise to run a negative campaign.  Some, like
Libby, say whether it would benefit Stanton or not, the
candidate should avoid attacking his opponent's personal life. 
(When Stanton follows the advice and assails his competitor's
stand strictly on the issue of social security, his popularity
ostensibly rises.)  The only scene which calls for a leap of
audience credibility deals with Libby's fate, an unusual
outcome particularly considering the outspoken woman's
apparent thick skin.  Kathy Bates steals the show with a
remarkable performance, one that goes over the top when her
character points a loaded gun at the genitals of a sleazeball
who engineered a doctored tape on a national TV interview
program.
   Adrian Lester as Henry Burton, Stanton's most important
liaison with the public, remains the center of this epic film, a
man whose ambiguousness toward the governor mirrors the
equivocal feelings of large segments of the American public
about President Clinton.  Emma Thompson shows that an
English actress can easily assume the role of an ambitious,
smart American First Lady, and fine performances are turned
in by the ensemble of strategists and adversaries including
Paul Guilfoyle (who brings Burton on board), and Larry
Hagman as Stanton's ultimate opponent, a man who seems
without a single flaw but whose major blemish is discovered
and ethically exploited.  Rated R.  Running time: 140 minutes. 
(C) Harvey Karten 1998

Author
Pierce Dalton
 President Clinton not withstanding, Senator Jack Stanton has an issue.
 It is only two weeks til the Presidential Primary, and he is being accused of
something he did not commit.  So we assume.
 A very close friend says his daughter is pregnant, and Stanton is the father.
 And you thought the Monica Lewinski deal was major.
 A political satire that isn't, Primary Colors is a viciously funny, very real
comedy/drama about the ups and downs of Stanton's run for President.
 Based on the novel by "Anonymous" (later revealed as a Newsweek writer),
Colors is a mirror image film: a film that is so real, it doesn't even play for
fiction.
 John Travolta is so go as Stanton, I forgot that I wasn't watching Clinton
himself. Stanton is a dead ringer for Clinton.
  Emma Thompson is no Hilary.  Her Susan is a warm, kind person who wants to
win the primary for, not just herself, but for her and Jack.
 The rest of Stanton's team includes Henry (British newcomer Adrian Lester),
who narrates the film, Richard (Billy Bob Thornton), Daisy (Maura Tierny) and
the investigator Libby (Kathy Bates - who's excellent.)
 Colors is a brilliant, hystarical political comedy that is almost as good as
the classic Wag the Dog.
 Its not only satire, but an important film that could very easily play for
history classes, aside from the R rating.
 It doesn't just make Stanton look like a womenizer.  It makes him look human.

Author
Matt Williams
In 1994, an insider's look at a scandal-ridden run for the Democratic
presidential nomination (closely based on Clinton's 1992 campaign) was
written anonymously (former Newsweek writer Joe Klein later claimed true
authorship).  Now, the book, Primary Colors, has been made into a movie,
directed by Mike Nichols, and, in light of recent presidential scandals,
seems to be more relevant than ever. But the film is more than a
diatribe against, or a paean in praise of, the president.  It is a
fascinating look at the political machinery, and the ethical quagmire,
that surround modern politics.
Jack Stanton (John Travolta) is the governor of a small southern state
running for the Democratic presidential nomination.  He is charismatic,
but has several flaws which threaten to doom his campaign, and strains
his relationship with his wife, Susan (Emma Thompson).
The film is told from the point of view of Henry Burton (Adrian Lester),
grandson of a civil rights leader, who is swept away by Stanton's ideals
and helps to organize the campaign.  He joins political strategist
Richard Jemmons (Billy Bob Thornton, looking an awful lot like James
Carville), and campaign advisor Daisy Green (Maura Tierney).
Governor Stanton's past repeatedly pops up to haunt him, a fact that his
chief rival, Lawrence Harris (Kevin Cooney), consistently uses to his
advantage.  To help clean up the Stanton campaign, Jack and Susan bring
in an old friend, Libby "The Dustbuster" Holden (Kathy Bates).
The acting throughout Primary Colors is superb. It would be worth seeing
the movie for Bates' wild performance alone. She enlivens the atmosphere
with energy in a truly boisterous performance. Travolta does a fair
Clinton impersonation as Governor Stanton, although his accent does
stray a little.  Emma Thompson delivers a strong performance as his
suffering wife who can't let anything show that might hurt the
presidential run.
The problem with political movies is that they tend to alienate over
half of their audience by promoting one side or the other, or else the
movie is vague to the point of boredom.  Primary Colors treads lightly
on this issue.  Though Stanton is clearly portrayed as a Democrat, and
there are a few minor barbs thrown in the way of Republicans, the movie
touches on few actual political issues. In fact, most of the "bad guys"
are fellow Democrats on the same road to the White House.
Rather than issues, the film is primarily concerned about scandals and
spin control.  Although the film strays into some obviously non-Clinton
territory, it is difficult to completely separate it from reality
(particularly when certain scenes seem to highlight the President's
current troubles).
Primary Colors' chief problem is its length.  It runs about 15 minutes
too long.  There are some scenes which could have easily been cut. For
example, midway through the film, the candidate gives a speech to an
assembly of laid off machinists.  The scene's only apparent purpose is
to establish Stanton's character, which has already been done in similar
scenes earlier in the film.  The extra length isn't long enough nor
tiring enough to be annoying, but it mars an otherwise excellent film.
Republicans, Democrats, and political agnostics should all be able to
find something to like in Primary Colors.  It's a funny, and at some
times shocking, look at the modern political process.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Author
Michael Redman
Clinton...err, Stanton, flies his colors
There's a popular maxim that the American public gets exactly the politicians
that it deserves. It's difficult to judge the truth of that because the masses
never really see these men and women, only their public faces. The demand that
they live the life of saints has created a situation where everyone in office
must lie in order to remain there.
The film from the novel by  (no longer) "Anonymous" (former "Newsweek" writer
Joe Klein) follows the presidential primary campaign of Jack Stanton (John
Travolta), a very thinly disguised Bill Clinton. Although the book is loosely
based on Clinton's 1992 campaign, it would be a mistake to take it as truth.
Some events are drawn from reality; others are completely fictional.
Told from the point of view of Henry (a darker George Stephanopoulos) Burton
(Adrian Lester), the story is one of difficult decisions. Burton is an
idealistic young black man drafted into the position of campaign manager for
the southern governor. At first he is excited about working for a man who
matches his vision. After a series of scandals, he has to re-think his
position and determine how much he is willing to bend to get his candidate elected.
Charismatic Stanton has a thing for the ladies. He's shown bedding down the
head of a teacher's union, accused of fathering the child of a teenage girl
and is the subject of a Gennifer Flowers lookalike's tabloid tale. Although
potentially a fatal flaw for a politician, his uncontrolled libido is not the
moral dilemma at the core of the film.
Is it justifiable for a politician to tell something different from the
truth? What is the high ground in terms of dealing with damaging personal dirt
about your opponent? These are the major issues at stake.
Stanton genuinely cares about the common man. In a scene reminiscent of
Edward Hopper's painting "Nighthawks", he sits in a Krispy Kreme doughnut shop
in the middle of the night listening to the lone employee explain how he has
to work impossibly long hours just to make ends meet. To demonstrate his
concern and get elected, the would-be president fabricates stories about his
past during speeches. They could have been true, they just aren't.
When campaign investigator Libby Holden (Kathy Bates), a stand-in for real
life Betsy Wright, comes up with information that would sink his opponent
there is the question about what to do with it. Stanton has refused to "go
negative" previously, but this material would guarantee his victory.
Is Stanton God or Satan? It turns out, like politicians in the real world,
he's neither. Admirably the film doesn't provide easy answers, but we do see
that idealism and politics are not good bedfellows...although other campaign
workers might be.
That politicians and their staff are human beings might come as a surprise to
many people. The media and the public tend to see them as symbols and forget
that there's flesh and blood there. If a friend has an extra-marital affair,
it's unfortunate, Maybe the couple can work things out and if not, well, it
happens every day. If the President of the United States does the same thing,
there's moral outrage. In "Primary Colors", the characters are people:
sometimes noble and certainly flawed.
Remembering my experiences as a minor staffer during a congressional race
years ago, the behind the scenes look feels realistic. Nothing is as organized
and unified as it appears from the outside. The intense feelings and abrupt
coming and going of staff members seem about right. It's not a shock when
co-workers end up in bed together.
Director Mike Nichols ("The Graduate", "The Birdcage") has a remarkable cast
here. Billy Bob Thornton who has burst on the cinema scene like a house afire
during the past year plays self-proclaimed redneck spin doctor Henry Burton
Jemmons (or maybe it's James Carville). Emma Thompson is Stanton's wife Hilary
-- err, Susan. Florida governor Fred Picker (possibly inspired by Jerry Brown)
is portrayed by Larry Hagman who has turned out to be quite the talent after
his mundane years on television.
Travolta is outstanding as the good ol' boy with an apple fritter in one
hand, a greasy chicken leg in the other and always talking the talk. Gnawing
on a rib held in his hands, you can tell that he's filled with a gusto for
being alive. That zest is what gets him into trouble, but it's also what gets
him elected. Travolta is one of those actors with such a presence that
sometimes he's "John Travolta" rather than the character. It's a testament to
his skills that just minutes after the film starts, you forget the actor and
see Jack Stanton.
The real standout is Bates. Her inspired off-the-wall (judged safe for the
campaign because, after all, she's been out of the mental institution for
months) pistol-toting lesbian has a fire in her belly for truth and justice.
She dominates every scene she's in. Her sexual persuasion is handled well in a
matter of fact manner. When Burton discovers the actual relationship with her
beautiful "assistant" (Stacy Edwards), it gets no more than a raised eyebrow.
Although you can look for Academy Awards acting nominations next spring,
there are odd moments. When the bigger than life Travolta, Thornton or Bates
is on-screen with some of the lesser-skilled others, the contrast is sometimes
jarring.  Lester's adequate performance appears flat when compared.
Clinton's popularity seemingly results from his persona as a real person.
This might mark a turning point in America's future. Politicians as human
beings? Who would have thunk it?
"Michael Redman's thoughtful analysis of the Oscars Presentation"
Only in Hollywood could they take such a lively art form and turn it into
such a boring non-event. It was the "Anti-Titanic".
(Michael Redman has written this column for 23 years and it might be that long
again before he watches another awards show.)
[This appeared in the 3/26/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com)
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Edwin Jahiel
PRIMARY COLORS *** 1/2  Produced and directed by Mike Nichols.Written by Elaine
May, based on the novel by Anonymous. Photography, Michael Ballhaus.
Editing,   Arthur Schmidt.Production design, Bo Welch. Music, Ry Cooder.
Cast: John Travolta (Gov.Jack Stanton), Emma Thompson (Susan Stanton),
Adrian Lester (Henry Burton), Billy Bob Thornton (Richard Jemmons), Kathy
Bates (Libby Holden), Maura Tierney  (Daisy Green),  Larry Hagman (Freddy
Picker),Paul Guilfoyle (Howard Ferguson),Caroline Aaron (Lucille Kaufman),
Rebecca Walker (March Cunningham), Mykelti Williamson (the illiterate man),
et al. A Universal Pictures release. 142 minutes. Rated R (language, sex)
Some day in  Afghanistan,  when they start showing films again and import
"Primary Colors," most viewers will make neither heads or tails of it.
Perhaps a mere handful of Afghans will see it as a movie on the Clintons.
More, but still few viewers --never mind the sty in their eye --will think
it is about the corrupt American electoral system and its strategies.
It would be good if the American public could appreciate the movie both as
Clintonesque and as a kind of docu-drama of our politics, instead of the
just the former, which is the majority perception.
The fact is that "Primary Colors" is the filmization of the eponymous novel
by former Newsweek writer Joe Klein, published with "Anonymous" as the
author. Klein, immediately suspected, at first denied, eventually 'fessed
up.
The book was a "roman a clef," (which means "a novel with a key" in
French), the kind that shows historical facts and real people but disguised
as fiction. The fiction is generally tricky so that the readers have to
solve puzzles of identification.  The faithful (with some excisions) movie
version is a "film a clef," but both incarnations are so transparent that
they're not really very clef.
John Travolta plays the Democratic Governor of an unnamed Southern State.
His nom-de-film is Jack Stanton, Jack as in Kennedy, Stanton as in Clinton.
He is running in the Presidential primaries. His wife Susan (Emma Thompson)
is at his side, and she's a damn good campaigner and adviser. To Stanton's
staff --initially one of dedicated amateurs --is added the young idealist
Henry Burton who wants to be part of history, and about whose late
grandfather (someone like Martin Luther King) everyone gushes.  Stantonites
include spin-doctor southerner Richard Jemmons, cute Daisy Green,
troubleshooter-fixer Libby Holden, and others.
Jack and Susan are "constructed" to look and sound as humanly as possible
like Bill and Hillary Clinton.  Henry Burton, an African American, is
derived from George Stephanopoulos (and played by a Brit) --a clever move
because Stephanopoulos is  Greek-American, hence, in terms of politics, a
member of a minority,  and Henry is also a member of a minority. Even more
than Stephanopoulos, he reinforces the aura of an all-inclusive, non-racist
entourage. (It also helps to get more black votes, of course). As Jemmons,
Billy Bob Thornton is a projection of James Carville. And so on, down the
line.
The film's opening is an inspired, funny visual and aural essay on the
variety of hand-shakes the Governor uses. It would stand by itself as a
prize-winning short. Then the portrait of Jack is expanded, amplified and
constantly added to. The man is a consummate politico who can pretend,
manipulate, cajole, inspire, move, cheat, you name it, he can do it.
In his first dramatic appearance, in a New York school where he encourages
minority adults to get an education, Stanton follows the sad tale of a
black man whom illiteracy has seriously damaged, raptly and with swelling
tear ducts.  He segues with the heartbreaking story of his own uncle, a
Congressional Medal of Honor winner who refused all school scholarships or
civilian offers, because--that was his shameful secret-- he too was
illiterate. Jack concludes with a moving and realistic paean of education.
Now here's a candidate who knows how to listen, who has sensible ideas, who
understands the hurt of others. But hold on! The uncle yarn will turn  out
to be pure invention. Hold on again ! If quick-change artist Stanton  can
lie like, well, a politician, he can also feel for other people. That's
what makes Jack such a complex, multi-layered fellow, and that's what the
movie captures with amazing accuracy. This goes well beyond the simple
Jekyll-Hyde transformation and into a far more devious and complicated
character.
Jack has the searching eye of a ladies' man eye and a high level of
testosterone. In his case as in others, those traits can be inseparable
from other talents. It's one big ball of wax. I wager that the name "Jack"
was chosen to evoke JFK, not only for  fast-thinking one one's feet but for
sexual shenanigans too.
Just being next to Stanton flusters so much the New York teacher who hosted
the meeting that she keeps stumbling on stairs. She later comes out of
Jack's bedroom, while the Governor does not even blink as his helpers,
assembled in the hotel suite, watch her exit. Nerves of steel? Nerve? Both.
The complexity, which extends to most other aspects of the movie, makes
"Titanic" look like child's play, save for the specials effects. The "PC"
director and writer are the once famous cabaret-type duo of Nichols and May
who, separated for years, were reunited on the stage, then for the film
"The Birdcage." Both are devilishly talented.
I bet they hurried to finish "PC" while the Presidential hubbub was at its
then-apex. I also bet that they wished the film could have come out in the
Fall of 1998, since that's when the likeliest Oscar candidates will be
released. While at today's date (late March 1998), "PC" leads the pack by
light-years, the memory of voting Academy members almost always disfavors
pre-summer releases.
Back to Henry, who is inducted in Jack's ranks in a whirlwind recruitment.
In "PC" we follow everyone, but it is Henry whom we watch as the nearly
always present thread, and as though he were the chorus of an ancient Greek
play. It is his actions, observations, reactions and reactions to reactions
that make us, the audience, identify with this decent, able and likable
young man. Henry takes us everywhere, to the mechanisms, agonies and
ecstasies of campaigning, including the New Hampshire primary that ends
with Jack in second place (to general jubilation) well after the story's
mid-point.
Much, if not most of the plot deals with the staff having to counter
rumors, accusations or sometimes deliberate lies, and what seems to be a
severe case of satyriasis (that's the Don Juan syndrome, the male
equivalent of nymphomania).  Among them is a phone call that incriminates
Jack as he talks sex with a hairdresser deliciously named Cashmere McLeod.
To the rescue comes gun-toting old pal Libby (Kathy Bates) who seems to
know everything and everyone and is wise to the Age of Electronics. More, I
cannot divulge.
The movie is fast, elliptical, humorous, amusing. It is also raunchy in
speech, acts and behavior. As a farce, it is amoral, immoral, cynical and
very funny. As an expose of political animals it has wild moments and
touching moments. It peeks with savvy into the exhausting process of
running for office, the higher the office, the more killing the effort.
It pulls no punches, but understands Jack Stanton, warts and all. There's a
magnificent night scene, the culmination of the collaboration between
director, writer, set designer and the master cinematographer Michael
Ballhaus. The camera pulls in doughnut-fancier Jack sitting across the
street in a glassed in a doughnut shop, chatting with true sympathy and
empathy with the lone, gimpy  employee. It's a rare, quiet interlude, an
Edward Hopper moment of isolation,  except that Jack's presence promises
some hope for the proletarian employee. It is also a moving moment of
epiphany for Stanton. And it justifies another scene: as Billy Bob is
quitting his job (he'll come back), he takes his leave of Henry, asks him
to stick with Jack. "This one's worth it."
A speech to laid-off workers, from the heart and with no b.s. is as good as
anything Frank Capra ever did, and far more believable. Events that involve
talk-show hosts Larry King, Charlie Rose, Geraldo Rivera, Bill Maher (as
themselves), or  Rob Reiner (as Izzy Rosenblatt), keep hitting the mark.
The Reiner episode catalyzes changes that will affect Jack's rival
candidate. This sets in motion a crazy yet believable chain that ends up
involving ex-Florida Governor Picker (Larry Hagman), who is the soul of
decency --but has a secret.
Hagman underacts with admirable control, at the opposite pole of his famous
"Dallas" performances on TV. Which brings me to the performers. They are a
superb (and superbly cast) cast. As Susan Stanton, Emma Thompson has a
number of choice scenes with terse and fast dialogue as well as reactions.
She is attractive, at times seductive, even sexy. Henry is endearing. Libby
is a great, bossy, volcanic strategist with pit bull determination, yet I
have a feeling that her part is a bit overdone, not in acting but in her
skills. Nor am I too convinced by the final episode that concerns Libby.
(No, I won't give it away. This is, after all, also a political thriller).
Then there's Travolta, that Lazarus of actors who came back from the dead
with "Pulp Fiction." He does very well, yet if you expect a total
impersonation of Bill Clinton you simply won't get it. You might have, in a
stage-play. But in a film, with its merciless close-ups, Travolta can only
be a semi-Clinton.
There's common agreement that the real President is as smart as they come,
a well-educated thinker-doer. I'm not swayed by his Rhodes scholarship
since many scholars, even famous ones, are really duds. Still, the real
Clinton leaves no doubts about his native intelligence.
Travolta can be a very fine actor. He gives a striking, cunning
performance, but he cannot change his spots. If you don't allow Jack his
very own personality; if you concentrate on the Clinton/Stanton parallels
to the detriment of the bigger picture; if you search for convincing
Clintonisms, no matter what Travolta does, he does not exactly radiate with
brains. In any case, directors and witers have to be intelligent, but
thespians don't, so long as they have talent. There's no denying that a
person with Jack's characteristics could be a Governor or President. Or
become a Hollywood star.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Author
Bob Bloom

 Primary Colors (1998) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring John Travolta, Emma
Thompson, Kathy Bates, Billy Bob Thornton and Adrian Lester.
 Forget all you've read in the papers and news magazines, or what you've
heard on television.
 It's time to judge Primary Colors simply by what director Mike Nichols and
his outstanding cast have brought to the screen.
 What they have accomplished is both a celebration and an indictment of the
American political system.
 As anyone who hasn't been living under a rock for the past month or so
knows, Primary Colors, based on the book by Anonymous (former Newsweek
columnist Joe Klein), is the story of a Southern governor's quest for the
presidency.
 Any resemblance to Bill Clinton is purely coincidental (wink, wink).
 A witty and wicked blend of comedy and drama, Primary Colors is not so
much the story of a presidential campaign as it is a Faustian morality
tale, a battle for one man's soul.
 Ironically, the soul in question is not presidential hopeful Jack Stanton,
but that of his deputy campaign manager, Henry Burton.
 Burton, the idealist grandson of a famed civil rights leader, hesitantly
joins the Stanton team because he thinks the candidate offers hope and a
new vision.
 But as he slowly comes to realize, Stanton leaves his idealism at the door
in his drive to win. Henry's battle is whether it is worth forsaking his
values for what Stanton and his team consider the greater good - the future
of the country - or bolt, thus putting his personal vision ahead of his
pragmatism.
 As Henry, British actor Adrian Lester continually shows not only his
internal conflict, but the slow tide of disillusionment that creeps over
him as he gets deeper and deeper into the machinations of the Stanton
campaign.
 As Stanton, John Travolta does more than a Clinton imitation. He portrays
a man who hungers not only for the approval, but the love of the people -
all the people.
 Stanton, though mouthing platitudes about idealism, believes the ends - no
matter how amoral - justify the means, which is getting him elected so he
can create a kinder, gentler United States.
 Travolta, with his soft, raspy Southern drawl, is a good old boy who
leaves the dirty work to his underlings while focusing on his vision of
reshaping the nation.
 Travolta's Stanton shows a genuine interest in people. But he is not a
paragon of virtue. Scandal sticks to him like flies to a garbage truck. He
is a womanizer and a liar.
 Yet, he is charismatic. You like Stanton even though, like his real-life
counterpart, you find it difficult to respect him.
 The moral center of the movie is Kathy Bates as Libby, Stanton's campaign
trouble-shooter. Her job is to clean up whatever he steps in. At first
appearance, Bates' character is almost caricature and cartoonish, yet as
the movie progresses from comedy to drama, her Libby displays a dignity and
righteousness that rises above petty politics.
 Emma Thompson's Susan Stanton is the foundation on which the Stanton
campaign rests. Thompson's Susan is a woman who knows she has made a pact
with the devil and is resigned to see it through to the finale, because she
is certain - like everyone else in her husband's orbit - that his good
intentions outweigh his peccadilloes and other human frailties.
 Thompson's body language tells all: her humiliation, anger, hurt and
steely determination to see her husband succeed.
 A sharp, pungent script by Elaine May is satiric, vicious, tragic and,
surprisingly, compassionate. Her ear for dialogue is unerring, and she
refuses to simply pigeonhole characters as good or bad.
 For example, Larry Hagman's former governor who enters the race to pose a
late threat to Stanton could have been portrayed as a Ross Perot-type of
buffoon. But Hagman, through Nichols' direction and May's script, brings a
quiet dignity to his character that most other protagonists lack.
 Primary Colors is an engrossing movie, the best so far that deals with
American politics. It champions the process while at the same time
deflating it.
 Despite denials from Nichols, Travolta and others that the movie is about
Clinton, current events surrounding the president do add an undeniable
undercurrent to the movie.
 And for those conspiracy theorists who think the president cut a deal with
Travolta or Nichols to soften the film's portrayal of Stanton, you'll have
better luck finding the gunman from the grassy knoll. If anything, Primary
Colors will make you look harder at the president, and to see what
sacrifices and compromises a person must make within himself to attain his
goals.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
George Wilcox
        It almost seems appropriate that the much-anticipated
political flick "Primary Colors" is as two-faced as its main
character, Gov. Jack Stanton played by John Travolta.
        Based on the best-selling book by Newsweek editor Joe Klein,
aka Anonymous, "Primary Colors" follows the eerie parallels of the
Clinton 1992 Presidential campaign. Travolta really is a look-alike,
sound-alike to President Bill Clinton, right down to the home-spun
stories, jogging suits and appetite for women and food. In fact, where
ever Stanton is seen, there is something to eat. In the course of this
movie, Stanton has eaten barbequed ribs, fried chicken, donuts, apple
fritters and Chinese food.
        The first half of "Primary Colors" is a wonderful,
humor-filled political satire that rivals Tim Robbins' "Bob Roberts,"
one of the best movies of 1992 that nobody went to see. When Stanton
is accused of an unforgivable sex act, "Primary Colors" makes a wrong
turn near Albuquerque that takes the film in an unexpected direction
that it is not completely able to recover from. The first half may
follow closely to Clinton's first presidential campaign, but the
second half is quite fictional. "Primary Colors" uneasily turns from
comedic satire to moody drama. There is not a single laugh in the
film's second half.
         Frank Capra's classic "Mr. Smith Goes to Washington" can pull
off the adjustment from satire to moody drama. Its ending, when Jimmy
Stewart's Smith nearly becomes a beaten man, is as dark as any other
Capra film. I know Jimmy Stewart (figuratively) and Travolta is no
Jimmy Stewart.
        It appears director Mike Nichols ("The Birdcage") and
screenwriter Elaine May wanted to have it both ways. The former
University of Chicago comedy partners try to cover all grounds with
subplots right out of TV's "Spin City" and final ethical tests similar
to what Spencer Tracy faced in Capra's "State of the Union."
        The satire in "Primary Colors" follows "Bob Roberts," a funny
semi-documentary, behind-the-scenes look at a Pennsylvania
businessman's run for senator. Jack Stanton and Bob Roberts could feel
right at home together as couch potatoes watching college football on
the tube.  Actually, they are both frauds. They know it. The voters
don't.
        When "Primary Colors" opens, Stanton is a Southern governor
from an unnamed state, who is trying to get known in New Hampshire,
site of the first presidential primary. Ivy-League trained political
advisor Henry Burton (British actor Adrian Lester) is reluctantly
brought in to assist. Emma Thompson plays Stanton's wife, Susan, while
Billy Bob Thornton is the skilled campaign manager and Kathy Bates
steals the show as troubleshooter Libby Holden.
        Need a scorecard to find the modern parallels?
        Travolta is Bill Clinton, Thompson is Hillary Rodham Clinton,
Lester is George Stephanopoulos, Thornton is James Carville and Bates
is advisor Betsy Wright. There is also a Gennifer Flowers look alike,
who publicizes her affair with Stanton -- Clinton -- through a popular
supermarket tabloid.
        Bates clearly steals the show in an Oscar-caliber supporting
performance as the hired gun brought in to fight off troubling news
about Stanton's philandering ways. Bates has mastered the style of the
tough-as-nails, cranky boss.
        One problem with May's script is that we never fully get to
know Stanton. Why is he running for president after all, and beyond an
adult literacy issue, what else does he stand for? I guess I shouldn't
feel so badly that I would rather vote for Kevin Kline's Dave rather
than a politician that seems more like the real thing.
        In 1993, documentary filmmakers D.A. Pennebaker and Chris
Hegedus released "The War Room," which filmed Clinton's Little Rock
campaign headquarters in '92. It's easy to see how Stanton's small
staff equalled Clinton's inner sanctum, though "The War Room" is set
only a few months after "Primary Colors."
        "Primary Colors" clocks in at a too-long 2 1/2
hours. Travolta, who seemingly dances in every one of his movies
("Saturday Night Fever," "Grease," "Perfect," "Pulp Fiction," and
"Michael") gives his worst dance performance of his career since
"Staying Alive."
        One trivial note: That's former "Dukes of Hazzard" tow truck
driver, Rep. Ben Jones, as one of Stanton's campaign advisors.
        Rating: Two-and-a-half stars

Author
Ben Hoffman
 As of this writing, the Oscars for Best whatever in 1997 have not
yet been named but I would hope that the 1998 Best Actor nominations
will include John Travolta for his performance as Governor Jack
Stanton in PRIMARY COLORS.   For that matter, there are many solid
performances by every supporting actor in that very solid and most
entertaining movie.   None of that is or should come as a surprise
of course as the screenplay is by Elaine may, and the direction by
Mike Nichols, a proven combination.
 In a satire with more truth than poetry, the film is ostensibly
about Bill Clinton's 1992 campaign for the presidency but is much
more than that.  For one thing, it shows what kind of a person has
the stamina, the charm, the determination to know what to do to win
. . . and then to let nothing stop him. This is true of most all the
Presidents in the past.
 As portrayed by Travolta, Clinton exudes charm.   It is easy to see
why people would like him.  It is also easy to see how the speeches
he makes on his campaign trail are designed to please the kind of
audience he is addressing. . . and is that not a fact of life in
campaigning?  Tell a working class group that your mother worked in
a factory "just as you do so I know what it is like."   Tell a
Jewish group that you are a great supporter of Israel. Tell an
elderly group that your opponent (not necessarily true) wants to
tamper with Social Security.
 Back in 1993, the documentary THE WAR ROOM gave a good indication
of what campaigning and elections are all about.   One thing that
boggled my mind was that after the election, James Carville,
Clinton's campaign manager, married Mary Matlin who was second in
command of the Bush campaign. During the campaign she called Clinton
"a prevaricator, a draft dodger and a philanderer."   That tells us
something about the sincerity of all involved and Primary Colors
shows it in even brighter hues.
 In addition to Travolta, outstanding performances were given by
newcomer to the American scene but well known for his work on the
London stage, Adrian Lester in his role as Henry Burton, the
campaign manager.   Susan Stanton, (Emma Thompson) the Governor's
wife, is portrayed as having a one track mind: win the election
with no regard for how.  She wants to be the First Lady and nothing
will be allowed to stop that from happening.  Next is Libby Holden
(Kathy Bates) as the tough private confidante of the governor.
Bates is great!
 Others in the cast are political advisor Richard Jemmons (Billy Bob
Thornton) and Freddy Picker, (Larry Hagman) a former governor of
Florida, whose one secret indiscretion many years ago can devastate
his attempt to beat Stanton if the Stanton campaign team wishes to
make the news public. Cameos by Rob Reiner, Diane Ladd, Robert
Klein, Geraldo Rivera, Charlie Rose and Larry King.
 The film is based on the novel by Joe Klein who kept his identity
hidden for a while by having the author listed as "Anonymous."
Obviously, he was an insider in Washington and knew the scene very
well.
 PRIMARY COLORS is entertaining and informative, telling it as it is
with few, if any, holds barred.   Go see it!

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: March 20, 1998
Starring: John Travolta, Emma Thompson, Adrian Lester, Billy Bob
Thornton, Maura Tierney, Kathy Bates, Larry Hagman
Directed by: Mike Nichols
Distributed by: Universal Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (strong language, sexual references) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/primary.htm
It's hard to imagine that a movie with a cast so powerful and a theme so
poignant could fall so short of the mark. It's interesting to note that
the A-list cast may be all that keeps this political drama from sinking
into the murky waters of near-obscurity. There's a scene in PRIMARY
COLORS where five or six grown men and women all hug each other around a
plate of barbecued ribs and sing "You Are My Sunshine," and although the
scene is laughable in context, nobody ever stops to think that the
situation is horribly outrageous. Why? Because among the makeshift
chorus are John Travolta, Emma Thompson, and Billy Bob Thornton. Those
three alone have the power and tenacity on screen to turn a silly
sing-along into a fantastic character-building sequence. And perhaps
that's the film's best quality: the character of the cast, from the
leads to the supports. 
There's a somewhat-definite line drawn between the two or three lead
roles and the dozens of supporting actors and actresses. The leads,
Governor Jack Stanton (Travolta) and his wife Susan (Thompson), are
clearly the most serious of the lot. Other main characters, like Henry
Burton (Adrian Lester), Daisy Green (Maura Tierney), and Richard Jemmons
(Thornton) are the buffer between the seriousness of the Stantons and
the hazy stereotypes of the rest of the cast. Finally, on the opposite
end of the spectrum, are the numerous two-bit roles that are written off
as hilariously abnormal parts. The range of the cast knows no bounds:
they are the butt of countless racist, sexist, anti-Semetic, and
homophobic jokes, and they are the funniest butt you will ever see.
There is no word in the English language to describe them. 
But the story that all of these characters have to follow is based on a
novel that is not well written. PRIMARY COLORS, the novel by Anonymous,
was good as an infomercial on the business of running a Presidential
campaign, but as a story its entertainment value was nil. The movie,
which stays very faithful to its in-print basis, is simply the story of
a virtually unknown governor from an small, unnamed Southern state who
runs for President. Of course, everything the story resembles Bill
Clinton's 1990-91 campaign, but that's quietly brushed off to the side
as mere happenstance. While that may be the media's official line, it's
hard to dismiss John Travolta's salt-and-pepper hair color or his
sweet-as-molasses Southern lilt as happenstance. Emma Thompson, too,
lives up to the fierce political advocate of the current First Lady,
although she doesn't come as close as the book's version.
This movie is not the most powerful motion picture you will see this
year. Its running time of 140 minutes is on the long end of watchable,
especially when the story isn't that interesting and Director Mike
Nichols does not do anything to spice it up. There is no powerful music,
no skillful photography, and no well-written script. This may be a
textbook example of a book's transition into film, but it is not a
thoroughly entertaining film. When the only recent comparison is WAG THE
DOG, which was a better product, I hesitate to say that this is a good
movie. Nevertheless, it may be worth watching for curiosity alone. The
bottom line is that this film's value will be based on viewer merit.
FINAL AWARD FOR "PRIMARY COLORS": 2.0 stars - a fair movie.

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: John Travolta, Emma Thompson, Adrian Lester, Billy Bob Thornton, 
      Maura Tierney, Kathy Bates, Larry Hagman, Paul Guilfoyle
Director: Mike Nichols
Producers: Mike Nichols
Screenplay: Elaine May based on the novel by "Anonymous" (Joe Klein)
Cinematography: Michael Ballhaus
U.S. Distributor: Universal Pictures
     It would be possible to write pages and pages comparing and 
contrasting the reality of Bill Clinton's 1992 Presidential campaign 
with the fictional one of Jack Stanton, the candidate in PRIMARY COLORS.  
Likewise, it would be equally possible to develop a lengthy piece about 
the similarities and differences between the movie and the best-selling 
novel upon which it is based.  Since more qualified individuals than I 
will be penning articles of this sort over the next few days and weeks, 
I feel confident that I can narrow the scope of this review (mostly) to 
the movie itself, and let others worry about the divisions between fact 
and fiction.
     Of course, it's impossible not to note that many of the characters 
in the film bear a striking resemblance to certain counterparts in the 
Clinton camp.  Equally noteworthy is the fact that the movie 
dopplegangers are portrayed more kindly their respective book 
incarnations.  This is partially the result of the direction in which 
director Mike Nichols (THE GRADUATE, THE BIRDCAGE) has chosen to take 
the film.  Joe Klein's novel (which he published under the "Anonymous" 
pseudonym) is a cynical satire about life on the campaign trail.  It's 
harsh, blistering, and possesses an edge that the film, a warmhearted 
comedy/drama, lacks.  And, while the motion picture still makes some 
rather uncomfortable points about the sacrifices of virtue necessary to 
win an election, its approach is much gentler than that of the book, or, 
for that matter, another recent movie, WAG THE DOG, or the documentary, 
THE WAR ROOM.
     There's merit in briefly running through the film's major 
characters and identifying their real-life counterparts, if only to 
satisfy the curiosity of those who have seen the picture and aren't 
sure.  Jack and Susan Stanton (John Travolta and Emma Thompson) are, of 
course, Bill and Hilary Clinton.  The movie's central figure, whose soul 
becomes a battleground between politics and idealism, is Henry Burton 
(Adrian Lester), a black version of George Stephanopoulos.  Richard 
Jemmons (Billy Bob Thornton), a plain-speaking spin doctor, is obviously 
James Carville.  Campaign adviser Daisy Green (Maura Tierney) represents 
Mandy Grunwald, and dirt-digger Libby Holden (Kathy Bates) exhibits 
similarities to Betsey Wright.  There's also a Gennifer Flowers-type 
named Cashmire McLeod (Gia Carides) and a Paul Tsongas stand-in, 
Lawrence Harris (Kevin Cooney).  
     In a nutshell, the film follows a Democratic presidential candidate 
from the early days of his campaign, when he's preparing for the New 
Hampshire primary, to the vanquishing of his final opponent.  Governor 
Jack Stanton, who is charisma personified, wins over voters as a result 
of his relaxed manner, apparent empathy with his audience, and 
refreshingly open approach. ("I'm gonna do something really outrageous -
- tell the truth," he declares at one point.  The irony of that 
statement, I'm sure, is not lost on anyone.)  But Jack has a number of 
skeletons in his closet, many of which are associated with sexual 
indiscretions, and his advisors work overtime to keep them concealed.  
     Not everything in PRIMARY COLORS is stripped from the historical 
account of Clinton '92.  One of the key players in the film, Fred Picker 
(Larry Hagman), the "miracle candidate," has no real-life counterpart.  
In addition, much of what transpires during the closing half-hour has 
little or no basis in fact.  It's purely Klein's invention, as filtered 
through Elaine May's script.  Likewise, the resolution of the Cashmire 
McLeod situation is radically different from how things turned out with 
Gennifer Flowers.  
     However, while the film is smart and perceptive in its take on 
American politics, it's dramatically weak.  Nichols frequently seems 
caught in a palpable quandary:  is this a satire, a drama, or a 
cautionary tale?  Because PRIMARY COLORS vacillates uncertainly between 
the three, it's not strong as any of them.  There's also a question of 
whether Nichols and May softened the book to avoid appearing too 
critical of the President.  Is PRIMARY COLORS an attack, a retreat, or 
an apology?
     My biggest complaint about the film is the length.  At 140 minutes, 
it's too long, with several sequences that border on becoming tedious.  
I also found Burton's constant moral struggles to be more irksome than 
believable.  Maybe I'm just too cynical, but I have trouble accepting 
that someone that deep in the political process would be beset by so 
many doubts.  (This, incidentally, was one of my complaints about THE 
AMERICAN PRESIDENT.)  Humanizing a character is one thing, but making 
him too noble, especially in a movie that has a satirical basis, can be 
problematic.  And, while the parallels between real individuals and 
fictional characters are interesting, they can't sustain a feature-
length motion picture on their own.
     Some of the problems inherent in adapting a book for the screen are 
evident as well.  Many crucial relationships (such as the one between 
Burton and Green) are left half-developed (we see the two in bed, but 
never really understand how they got to that point, or where they go 
afterwards).  Likewise, two-thirds of the way through, Green disappears 
with only a single-line write-out.  It's difficult to say where these 
elements were molded into their current form (i.e., in the screenwriting 
process or in the editing room), but, considering some of what survived 
in the final print, it makes for an uneven viewing experience.
     With one important exception, the performances are on-target.  
Travolta is wonderful as the Bill Clintonesque Stanton, with a Southern 
accent, white hair, a pot belly, and a boatload of charisma.  Emma 
Thompson, effectively shedding her British accent, creates a wonderfully 
human Susan, who loves her husband but erects an emotional shield to 
ward off being torn apart by his indiscretions.  Billy Bob Thornton, 
like James Carville, is a scene-stealer, as is Kathy Bates.  Solid 
support is provided by Maura Tierney, Larry Hagman, and Stacy Edwards 
(IN THE COMPANY OF MEN) as Holden's "assistant."  Unfortunately, I 
wasn't impressed by Adrian Lester's work, and, since the movie is 
presented from his perspective, this is a serious drawback.  Lester 
frequently seems stiff, and his performance is occasionally forced.  I 
was constantly aware that this is an actor playing a part, not a fully 
fleshed-out character.
     It will be interesting to see whether the fortuitous timing of this 
release boosts the box office numbers.  While there's nothing in the 
film that relates specifically to the recent allegations surrounding the 
President's sex life, there are at least as many parallels as in WAG THE 
DOG.  Jack Stanton is, after all, a noble, sincere man who genuinely 
wants to do good, but is impeded by an overactive libido.  And, as Klein 
will acknowledge (but Nichols and May will not), any coincidences are 
purely intentional.
Now with more than 1400 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"My belief is that no movie, nothing in life, leaves people neutral. You
either leave them up or you leave them down."

Author
Eric Lurio
This couldn't have come out at a more opportune time. It's silly and profound
at the same time and timely as hell and tells a truth as only a
fictionalization can.
Ages ago, there was a miniseries called `Washington: Behind Closed Doors' with
Jason Robards, Jr. as  President Richard Monckton, a thinly disguesed Nixon
clone. Changing the last name, permitted Robards to dig into what he though
was the inner man without doing a Tricky Dickie impression like Anthony
Hopkins would do twenty years later.
Jack Stanton (John Travolta) is to Slick Willie as Monckton was to Tricky Dick.
Travolta gets to delve into the inner Clinton without having to do an
impression. But do we want to follow him there?
We meet Henry Burton (Adrian Lester) the grandson of a beloved civil rights
leader, while he's following Governor Stanton around during a tour of an inner
city school adult literacy program. 
Before he knows it, Henry is recruited into Stanton's presidential campaign,
thereby getting himself dumped by his radical journalist girlfriend. But
that's okay, he's soon shacking up with Daisy Green (Maura Tierney), an
assistant campaign manager.
This is kind of an idealized version of the 92 campaign. We WANT to see
Hillery...um...Susan Stanton (Emma Thompson) slap her husband around when she
hears about Gennifer Flow...Cashmere McLeod (Gia Carides) tapes on the tube.
We surely would have wanted to hear like Henry and Libby Holden (Kathy Bates)
did, that the tapes were faked.[well I WOULD]
Elaine May's writing sparkles and Mike Nichol's direction is on the money.
Nichols has gotten himself one helluva cast here. Billy Bob Thornton is great
as spinmeister Richard Jemmons, and Kathy Bates gives her best performance
since `Misery,' Larry Hagman gives a truly bravura performance as rival
candidate Freddy Picker
This is, more than anything, about idealism. The Stantons are portrayed as
genuine idealists as are most of the campaign bigwigs.
The question is if you really believe in the principles how far would you go
to put them into effect? Would you just stay pure and attack anyone who
disagreed with you the merest iota like Henry's girlfriend? Or would you cheat
a bit, and cover up a peccadillo or two like the Stantons?
It's a question that the last part of the movie attempts to answer to great
effect. More and more it becomes apparent that Libby Holden is more central a
character than Mrs. Stanton is. 
Stick another one up on the provisional top-ten list. Every Republican in
congress should see this film.

Author
Jason Wallis
"Primary Colors" * * * * (out of four)
Starring John Travolta, Emma Thompson, Billy Bob Thornton, Kathy Bates,
Adrian Lester, Maura Tierney and Larry Hagman 
Directed by Mike Nichols 
Rated R for frequent profanity and mature themes 
Running 140 minutes 
As good a film as Mike Nichols' new political comedy "Primary Colors" is, I
think it is very likely that many people will find it somewhat
dissapointing. The reason for this is simple: it is not nearly as satirical
and vicious as people will be expecting from a movie mocking President
Clinton. So let's get one thing straight right off the bat; if you want to
see a film in the nature of "Dr. Strangelove" or "Network", filled with
blistering social comment, don't see this movie. 
Having said that, I still believe this is a superb movie (perhaps because I
wasn't expecting it to be biting political commentary) that takes what
could have turned out as a run-of-the-mill, "Saturday Night Live"-esque
spoof of Clinton and turned it into a fascinating, soft-hearted look into
what it would probably be like being involved in a political campaign. Is
it as great as the films I mentioned above? Of course not. Those are
timeless classics. But when being judged as an informative comedy about the
inner-workings of politics, it really comes off as quite an exceptional
film. 
The story, of course, revolves around the presidential campaign of Gov.
Jack Stanton (an obvious representation of Bill Clinton), a dim-witted but
smooth talking and good hearted good 'ol southern boy, more intersted in
eating apple fritters than making public appearences. And you can't really
have a character based on Clinton without having him screw around with
other women besides his wife, can you? So, naturally, he has sex behind his
wife's back with virtually anything that moves (it's nice to finally have
some realism in mainstream movies, isn't it?). His wife (Emma Thompson,
flawlessly shedding her British accent) is completely oblivious to his
sexual escapades, too busy running the campaign to even care if she did
know. 
Pretty soon, Stanton starts to encounter some pretty sticky situations, one
of which involoves a Gennifer Flowers-like hairdresser who claims that the
two have been carrying on a long-term affair and even says she has the
tapes to prove it! Is she telling the truth, or merely trying to get
publicity? The scene where we find out the truth is one of the film's best
scenes (there is some competition here). 
But even though it may sound like the movie is starring John Travolta and
Emma Thompson, the real star of the show is Adrian Lester as Harry Burton,
a reluctant but loyal political addvisor. Amazingly enough, Lester manages
to carry the movie himself, with Travolta and Thompson taking on what
almost seem like supporting roles. Not that they aren't in it that much,
it's just that it's easier to identify with Harry Burton and his problems
that that of the canidate and his wife's. The film, after all, is seen
through Burton perspective. 
Some other members of Stanton's political team include Billy Bob Thornton
as a scene-stealing Richard Jemmons, the governor's redneck, skirt chasing
strategist, Maura Tireney as the secretary-like Daisy Green and Kathy Bates
as the feisty lesbian Libby Holden, fresh out of a mental hospital. The
only actor who is really wasted in a part is Stacey Edwards (remember her
Oscar-callibar preformance in last year's "In the Company of Men"?) as
Libby's live-in (*cough, cough*) assistent. She's only in a few scenes in
the whole film. 
It's also very fun to try to match certain key characters to their
real-life counterparts. It's only obvious that the Stantons are supposed to
be the President and First Lady, but "Primary Colors" also takes some
clever jabs at such figures as James Carville (represented here by Richard
Jemmons) and Betsey Wright (Libby Holden in the film). 
There's is also alot to be said about Mike Nichols' brilliant direction
(making a nice rebound after the disappointing "Birdcage"). After about
twenty minutes into the movie, I stopped seeing Jack Stanton as Bill
Clinton incarnate, and started looking at him as a real person with real
problems. As much of a screw-up as the guy is, I actually started to care
about him. And any movie that can make you care about a politician has got
to be good. 
Check out Jason's "Filmaholics Anonumous" website at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Author
Steve Kong
Primary Colors is more than a retelling of the 1992 Clinton campaign; it's
an in-depth look at the political machine.  Surprisingly, the film does not
belong to John Travolta.  Yes, Travolta is in the film, but Adrian Lester
is the one to watch.
Primary Colors follows the presidential campaign of Jack Stanton (John
Travolta) who is a man of virtue that will not go dirty in order to win a
campaign.  He is a man who stops being a politician and starts telling the
truth.  In addition to his headstrong and clear-headed wife, Susan (Emma
Thomson), Stanton has a great campaign team behind him: Daisy Green (Maura
Tierney), Richard Jemmons (Billy Bob Thornton), Libby Holden (Kathy Bates),
and Henry Burton (Adrian Lester).
As in the real Clinton campaign, we have this historical stuff: a
womanizing president, the 'other woman,' and the spin-doctors that try to
hide the Presidential candidate's misdeeds.
The posters feature Travolta and Thomson prominently, but that is only a
way to draw the crowd in.  Yes, they have big roles, but they are not the
main characters.  Henry Burton, played well by Adrian Lester, is the main
character, and we see the campaign through his eyes.  Burton is at first
reluctant to join up with Stanton as his campaign manager.  After seeing
how selflessly Stanton reacted to group of illiterate adults who took their
own time to learn to read, Burton reconsiders.
In addition, we are introduced to the moral issues through him.  Lester
handles his role beautifully and draws us into the film.
The main scene-stealer, next to Lester, is Kathy Bates as the loud
potty-mouthed dirt digger, Libby Holden.  Her character becomes pivotal
late in the movie.  Bates, who I last saw in Titanic, has more to do here
and she handles it well.  I loved the scene in which she goes to talk to a
tabloid news guy about an audio tape.
Travolta is Bill Clinton.  He has the speech patterns, voice, and
mannerisms of Bill Clinton so well that it's scary.  Though Emma Thomson
has nothing in common with Hilary, she plays her part well.
The script by Elaine May is an adaptation of the book by the same name,
written by "Anonymous."  I have not read the book yet, so I cannot comment
on how well the book translated into the screenplay.  As it stands, the
screenplay is well written except for a few details.
Two big details bugged me.  The biggest was the 140-minute running time of
the film.  Director Mike Nichols should have edited some of the scenes.
The other complaint, and this may seem weird, is that the film seems to end
too abruptly.
However, as I drove away from the theatre, the ending seemed fitting and
after a few minutes of thought, I saw how well this ending works.  Most
people, though, will probably think that the ending was a bit forced and
abrupt.
Primary Colors is a good look into a campaign and the continuing dilemma:
should the candidate give up virtue in order to win?  This movie is not as
harsh as Wag the Dog was, but it still attacks Clinton in a softer, more
comical and satirical way.  In the end though, you'll walk out of the
theatre wondering what you would be willing to give up in order to win a
Presidential race.

Author
Sridhar Prasad
    During "Primary Colors", I honestly wondered what this film's impact 
would have been if we had never heard of Monica.  That we did makes 
"Primary Colors" all the more powerful.  Despite major flaws, and holes 
at the end of this modern-day fable, the questions it raises about our 
moral state in politics today are without a doubt powerful and 
important.  The basic question Mike Nichols and Elaine May raise is 
this: what part does morals and character play in choosing our 
President? 
    John Travolta turns in a solid, albeit unspectacular, performance as 
Jack Stanton, a Democratic progressive candidate who has mastered the 
art of the game.  He is an impeccable candidate, with populist positions 
and an ability to inspire.  However, like every other character, he is 
extremely flawed, with serious womanizing problems and troubles in his 
past.  During one of his many campaign stops, he meets Henry Burton 
(Adrian Lester).  Henry is beginning to question the present state of 
affairs, and he wants to be inspired. 
    Henry and Jack are joined by Susan Stanton, the ambitious wife 
played perfectly by Emma Thompson.  They are the three who define this 
story, it is through their eyes that we see this story unfold.  Billy 
Bob Thornton is hysterical as Richard Jemmons, a campaign consultant, 
and Kathy Bates turns in a marvelous performance as Libby Holder, a 
private investigator hired to protect the Stantons from any dirt that 
might come at them.
    The story follows the primary races, as Stanton battles for the 
Democratic nomination.  His main rival is Lawrence Harris, a New England 
senator who is running on an economic platform that is gaining support.  
Stanton has to face all obstacles.  He is running against Harris, the 
press, his vices, and the past.  Early on, we see how Stanton uses lies 
and deceit to conjure up an emotional anecdote that connects with a 
group of voters.  We ask, is this so wrong?  Shouldn't a man appeal to 
his constituents, because he must be able to inspire them, to make them 
believe?  Stanton's beliefs are never in question.  His flaws are 
extreme, especially his womanizing, that which we are introduced to 
early and often. 
    The story follows Stanton and Harris, and is often a raucous comedy 
filled with humor to the extreme.  However, midway through the campaign 
Harris suffers a heart attack.  The man who takes his mantle is Fred 
Picker, a former governor of Florida who runs an idealistic campaign on 
the issues AND on the moral high ground.  He abhors campaign finance 
abuses, therefore, he runs no ads.  He abhors words, so he leads by 
action.  Picker's campaign sets off a deep contrast between he and 
Stanton, whose vices add up tremendously.  Slowly, Henry is forced to 
make difficult decisions regarding his life, the people he loves, and 
the ideals he adheres to. 
    "Primary Colors" isn't a brilliant film.  The beginning is flat-out 
hysterical, but the comedy dies down when the movie becomes more of a 
character drama/study.  It is unevenly paced, too long, and simply 
boring at some parts.  Yet, it is also deeply emotional, it triggers 
responses which generate questions on the system of affairs today.  
"Primary Colors" just might be the most important film of the year 
because of what it shows about ourselves.  It is a mirror to our 
society, displaying our faults as people, and displaying the state of 
affairs in our nation.  It is not about the Presidency.  In the end, it 
is about ourselves.
FINAL: *** out of ****
Flawed, but important and entertaining nonetheless

Author
James Kendrick
Director: Mike Nichols
Screenplay: Elaine May (based on the novel by Anonymous)
Stars: John Travolta (Gov. Jack Stanton), Emma Thompson (Susan Stanton),
Billy Bob Thornton (Richard Jemmons), Kathy Bates (Libby Holden), Adrian
Lester (Henry Burton), Maura Tierney (Daisy Green), Larry Hagman (Gov.
Fred Picker), Diane Ladd (Mamma Stanton), Paul Guilfoyle (Howard
Ferguson), Rebecca Walker (March)
MPAA rating: R
Review: **1/2 (out of ****)
"Primary Colors" opens and closes with images of hearty handshakes. The
handshakes at the beginning of the film are introductory, as an unknown
Democratic candidate named Jack Stanton (John Travolta) from a forgotten
Southern state is trying to ingratiate himself with potential voters. At
the end of the film, that same unknown candidate is now President of the
United States, and the handshakes are congratulatory, as he thanks all
the men and women who worked behind the scenes to get him to the top.
I don't mind giving away the ending because I think we all knew it
already. No matter how much director Mike Nichols tries to deny it, Jack
Stanton is (or will be seen by the majority of the public as) a
thinly-veiled personage of Bill Clinton, and we all know how his 1992
presidential campaign ended. In between the handshakes that open and
close the film, "Primary Colors" weaves the tale of everything that goes
on -- both known and unknown to the public -- in order to get Stanton to
the Oval Office.
There is no sense in denying the connection between the film and real
life. If Nichols had really wanted to disassociate Stanton from Clinton,
why did he have Travolta not only impersonate Clinton in voice and
manner, but also put on weight and streak his hair gray? There are a
million opportunities to separate fact from fiction, and yet the movie
never takes those routes, and the results might be confusing to those
who aren't sure where the separation lies.
The movie is based on the novel by Joe Klein, a reporter for "Newsweek"
whose position as author of the book remained anonymous for six months
before "The Washington Post" ousted him. A great deal of the book is
pure fiction, but a great deal more of it is uncannily reflective of the
actual 1992 presidential campaign. Why else would it have stirred up all
the controversy it did when it was first published two years ago?
Both the book and the movie are told not from Stanton's perspective, but
through the eyes of Henry Burton (English stage actor Adrian Lester), a
campaign manager based on George Stephanopoulos, who is now a media
consultant for ABC. Burton is a young, idealistic political worker whose
grandfather was a great civil rights leader (unlike Stephanopoulos,
Burton is black). He joins Stanton's team because he truly believes that
Stanton is a winner, someone who really cares about the common people
and the issues facing them.
Among the other characters are Stanton's shrewd and sometimes icy wife,
Susan (Emma Thompson), obviously based on Hillary Clinton; Richard
Jemmons, the crafty, obnoxious redneck James Carville clone played by
Billy Bob Thornton; Daisy Green (Maura Tierney), based on campaign
advisor Mandy Grunwald; and last but certainly not least, Libby Holden,
the character played by Kathy Bates based on "the dust buster" Betsey
Wright, who spent most the '92 campaign digging up dirt in order to
protect Clinton from "bimbo eruptions."
In the weeks before the film opened, the question on everybody's mind
was whether it would remain true to the angry, indicting portrait of the
Clinton-like character painted by the novel. There was a great deal of
speculation that Hollywood, which so infatuates Clinton and is so
infatuated with him, would be unable to deliver a $65 million movie that
makes him look bad. Would Nichols' attendance of Clinton-thrown dinner
parties at Martha's Vineyard taint his ability to be critical of the
president, even in this fictional form? Would Thornton, an Arkansas
native and big Clinton supporter who actually asked the President's
permission to appear in the film, try to make his Carville character
look more decent that the conniving, sexist pig in the book?
In short, the movie is no doubt a softened version of the book. Of
course, how you feel about Bill Clinton will greatly taint your response
to the film's lighter look at his fictional doppleganger. Even Travolta,
in a interview for "George" magazine, said, "You have to be dead not to
see that the film favors Clinton."
"Primary Colors" can be seen as favoring Clinton because it shifts the
focus (or more accurately, blame) off the individual and puts it on the
political system. The movie goes to great pains to ensure we see it is
the system that is truly corrupt, and Stanton himself is simply a flawed
human being caught up in it and forced to play by its rules. When Henry
is threatening to quit at the end of the film, it's not because he's
tired of Stanton's morally reprehensible behavior and constant lying,
but because he's tired of playing "the game."
As "Primary Colors" makes clear, the blame lies with the cynical media
and the disaffected public at large, which is more interested in the
hair length of the candidate's wife than the candidate himself. The
movie portrays Stanton as an imperfect, but nonetheless decent and
caring man who has to work within a system of mud-slinging, back
stabbing, and constant spin control in order to achieve a greater good.
Of course, this is hardly a hidden agenda. Nichols has said in
interviews, "It's about our process, and where we've brought it and it's
brought us."
The problem with the movie-version of "Primary Colors" is that it never
seems very sure of where it stands. The book was explicit in its
indictment of Clinton (or his clone or whatever), but the movie, while
keeping most of the storyline the same and many of the scenes literally
verbatim, still manages to tiptoe around the issue of personal
responsibility. When Stanton is informed that a 17-year-old black girl
is claiming he is the father of her unborn child, he slams the wall and
says, "I just can't get a break, can I?" Never mind that he did sleep
with her and the child could very well be his (according to the book, it
is his, but the movie never makes it clear). The movie portrays this
situation as just another piece of tabloid garbage intended to derail
him. With the exact same dialogue, this could have been a thoroughly
satirical scene, but it just doesn't play out in that manner.
Another problem with the film is its dramatic structure and how it
develops the relationships between its characters. The film makes a
point to keep the marriage between Jack and Susan confusing and
ill-defined. Since the story is told through the eyes of Henry, I
suppose it's impossible to know completely what's going on between the
candidate and his wife since he's not privy to their private
conversations. Still, it makes for frustrating viewing because we never
know for sure if they still love each other, or if they're just playing
the game for the sake of politics.
However, some of the most egregious character development occurs between
the campaign staffers. For instance, twice we see Henry and Daisy in bed
together, although it does nothing to serve the story. Nothing is
suggested beforehand that they might sleep together, and the
relationship is never carried through to any kind of conclusion. A
similar situation happens between Libby (who's a lesbian), and a young,
attractive campaign volunteer played by Stacy Edwards (who was so
brilliant in "In the Company of Men"). Libby comes into the office,
tells some other staffers that she wants this particular volunteer
working for her, and the next thing we know, they're living together in
a loving, sexual relationship. Hello? Where did that come from and what
purpose does it serve?
However, despite these failures, "Primary Colors" has some truly funny
moments and interesting insight into the political process. Its
indictment of the mass media is sometimes effective, although it's a
tired, worn-out accusation that newspapers and television are behind all
the world's ills. Although the movie skillful depicts the dangers,
pitfalls, and all-around messiness of running for public office in this
country, it seems as a whole to be little more than another nail in the
coffin of personal responsibility.


Author
David Sunga
Written by: Elaine May (screenplay), based on the novel by 'anonymous'
(former NEWSWEEK political commentator Joe Klein)
Starring: Adrian Lester, John Travolta, Emma Thompson, Maura Tierney,
Billy Bob Thornton, Kathy Bates
Ingredients: 
Presidential primary elections, Bill Clinton-type candidate,
Hillary-type wife, young idealist
Synopsis: 
Is he or isn't he? That is the main question in this documentary-like
portrayal of a 1990s Presidential primary campaign. Is presidential
hopeful Jack Stanton essentially a decent man who must be ambiguous and
ruthless, and play hardball politics because the Presidential race
demands it, or is he an ambiguous and ruthless hardball politician who
is only playing at being a decent man in order to get votes? 
This is the main substance of the movie PRIMARY COLORS, and the question
remains unresolved even at the end of the movie. As a vehicle for
getting the audience to ask the question, PRIMARY COLORS follows the
'coming of age' of Henry (Adrian Lester), a young black idealist who
joins the staff of Governor Stanton's presidential campaign. Henry is
similar to real life former Clinton aide George Stephanopoulos. Other
campaign staff members in PRIMARY COLORS include strategist Richard
(Billy Bob Thornton), gay Libby (Kathy Bates), and media relations
expert Daisy (Maura Tierney). 
At first Henry is enthralled and charmed by Stanton because he believes
he has at last found a decent politician. But as the campaign winds its
way through two sex scandals and mudslinging attacks by political
opponents, Henry learns that Stanton might in fact be a ruthless
pretender. So is he, or isn't he? Henry ponders.
John Travolta plays Presidential hopeful Governor Jack Stanton and Emma
Thompson plays the governor's wife Susan Stanton. They seem to look and
act exactly like Bill and Hillary Clinton (including Bill Clinton's
silvery hair, high pitched voice, and Southern accent). Because the
movie is based on a 1996 'Washington insider' book about Clinton, the
movie dramatizes events that parallel Clinton's first presidential
primary campaign. A large part of their campaign involves dodging a big
sex scandal involving a Gennifer Flowers-type hair salonist named
Cashmere McCleod. 
Opinion:
The movie PRIMARY COLORS cannot be separated from the events of real
life. In WAG THE DOG the fictional American President was hit with a sex
scandal and responded by deflecting media attention to a bogus war with
Albania. In real life President Clinton was hit with allegations of
sexual misconduct, and media attention soon turned to an impending
showdown with Iraq. 
Today, fresh from the Monica Lewinsky scandal, in which President
Clinton was criticized for deliberately obstructing people from knowing
about his sex life, President Clinton faces more sex allegations from
Kathleen Willey. Similarly, in PRIMARY COLORS, zipper-guy candidate
Stanton faces pressure from accusations that he had sex with a
hairdresser and impregnated a teen baby sitter. And just as the
fictional Stanton beats the scandals, it seems very odd, but Clinton's
approval ratings seem to rise after each new woman.
So what are we to make of PRIMARY COLORS, a movie which concentrates not
on policies or issues, but on whether or not we should trust the lying,
philandering Stanton to be a good President?
In my opinion PRIMARY COLORS is not particularly exciting, and it never
really answers its principle question. It is a well acted movie, and
does an excellent job of depicting complex and relevant people in thinly
disguised real life situations.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        I don't care whether or not Jack Stanton, the character portrayed by
John Travolta in Primary Colors, is supposed to be Bill Clinton.  I've
read that he is, but it doesn't really matter.  I certainly don't care
about the book written by "Anonymous" (supposedly the author is
ex-Newsweek writer Joe Klein).  
        I think the entire situation is intensely silly.  If someone is going
to make a semi-biography about how our President got to where he is, why
not just do that?  Why all this secrecy?  Oh, I suppose that Clinton
wouldn't like a film to be made about him while he's still in office. 
Maybe this is just an easy way to tell the story without dealing with
whatever legal boundaries that needed to be crossed.
        In any event, this conspiracy stuff didn't give me a positive outlook
on Primary Colors before seeing it, although I expected to enjoy the
film.  But I didn't.  This film is profoundly uninteresting and
feigned.  It's phony in almost every scene, and painfully artificial in
each second of dialogue spewed out of Travolta's mushy, distracting,
Clinton-spoofing voice.  I despised almost every moment of this film,
and not necessarily because of Elaine May's script, but because of the
execution:  director Mike Nichols fails on a fundamental level to
explain the point of his film.  Is it an Intelligent and Cynical
satire?  Is it supposed to be a realistic account of how political
campaigns work?  Is it intended as a character study of Bill Clinton?  
        I don't know, and because Nichols goes in so many different directions,
the film is ultimately reduced to a soup of scenes that clash because of
their strikingly varied tones.  Some of these scenes work alone, but
many don't, and none of them work herded together in this disaster. 
This fact is not enhanced by the heinous, radically annoying performance
by John Travolta, a performance that has permanently made me cautious of
any film in which he may appear in the future. 
        The film is about Governor Stanton's efforts to win the Democratic
nomination for the Presidential race.  The story is told through the
eyes of Henry Burton (Adrian Lester), a young, ambitious man who is
recruited by Stanton and his wife, Susan (Emma Thompson), to manage a
large part of the campaign.  Henry believes that he's working for a
great man, and his loyalty is tested through numerous trials, most of
which involve accusations that Stanton sleeps around at every given
chance.  A subplot, which becomes the focus towards the end, involves
Kathy Bates as Libby Holden, an old friend of the Stantons who is hired
to see what kind of dirt the press is going to be able to dig up on
them.
        Much of the film is supposedly about the relationship between Stanton
and his wife.  The relationship the audience gets to see is about as
watered-down as the relationship the American public sees between Bill
and Hilary Clinton.  Every intimate discussion, each moment when there
might be a word that isn't politics-related, is absent from this film. 
This is clearly intentional on Nichols' part, because I imagine he's
trying to imitate, to an extent, the kind of view we have of the
President and his personal life.  
        This isn't to say that we see nothing of his personal life, because we
do.  We see that he gets "upset" when his wife finds out that he
probably had sex with a teenage girl (does anyone else find the thought
of this action deplorable?); similar reserved displays of emotion are
scattered throughout the film, but none of them paint a picture any
more-defined than the one we all have of Clinton.  Perhaps, if the point
of the film is specifically to document the details of a political
campaign, then my qualms with the handling of Stanton's character would
be invalid.  But if the point is just to show the campaign, then why go
to all the trouble to make Stanton a replica of Clinton?
        I'm not a fan of Clinton myself, but that's irrelevant.  Every single
scene that features Travolta--with the exception of none--is totally
plastic and insincere.  I didn't believe a word he said at any point
during the film.  When he gives his speeches to the uneducated masses
(apparently, the majority of the American public can not read and
continuously get fired from their factory jobs), each word Travolta
utters singed my nerves in a way no performance ever has.  Clinton
himself does not irritate me the way Travolta does in this film.  When
Travolta has scenes with Thompson, I feel like he's lying to her.  When
he's supposed to be "frank" and "honest" with the people around him, I
still feel like he's lying.  
        And again, if Nichols' point is to satirize the way we all think
politicians constantly lie, then hats off to him.  But he's created a
character and a situation, both of which we are clearly intended to care
about, and we do not, because 1) we don't know the guy, and 2) he
irritates us.  It simply doesn't work.
        In addition, many of the scenes in the film are frustrating and
peripheral to the story.  Billy Bob Thornton, for instance, plays a
character named Richard Jemmons who has nothing to do with the film, and
provides only a few scenes that develop his own pointless character. 
And the subplot involving Bates' character ends predictably--this entire
portion of the film, which is inserted to show the potential viciousness
of the Stantons, is routinely manipulative, and serves simply as
somewhere to end the film.
        Whatever minimal points I obligingly and generously give this film go
to the other actors:  Thompson is wonderful, and not given enough screen
time;  Lester is also very good, and plays his part convincingly; and
Bates is charismatic as always.  None of these actors can escape the
shadow of Travolta's tremendously wretched mockery of Clinton, however.
        I've heard that to criticize a film is to create a new one, but I can't
think of what might have made Primary Colors acceptable, or even
watchable, for that matter.  Wag the Dog, which was another political
film that I didn't enjoy, was at least consistent and thorough in its
endeavors.  Primary Colors wants to be intelligent and insightful, and
maybe it is when it comes to politics.  But it has so much extra stuff
for us to consider that it leaves us battered and confused as to what
it's trying to prove.  Films this inept and incoherent should be
illegal.
